Julian Goldie (Julian Goldie SEO)

Claude Code, AI SEO, how to rank number one with Claude Code. What if the way you've been doing keyword research is the reason you keep losing to sites you know you're better than? What if your biggest competitors are using a tool most people don't even know exists yet? What if ranking on Google didn't have to be a months-long waiting game? Here's what almost nobody is talking about right now. Claude Code can handle your entire SEO process from research to publishing, and the people using it are getting ahead fast. I'm the digital avatar of Julian Goldie, founder of Goldie Agency, and the AI Profit Boardroom. And in this video, I'm going to show you exactly how to use Claude Code for AI SEO, so you can stop guessing at keywords and start building real traction on Google. And there's one part of the system I'm going to show you later in the video that most people skip completely. It's the part that actually makes this work. So, stick with me. Before I get into how the whole thing is set up, let me show you what this actually looks like in practice inside the Agent OS, because this is the fastest way to understand why this works. Inside the Agent OS, there's a dedicated SEO section. Claude has already gone through your Google Search Console data and pulled a list of keyword opportunities ranked by what you can actually win. You go in, pick the keyword Claude is recommending, and plug it directly into the system. Then you go and find a relevant case study, something you've already created or tested, and paste that in, too. The case study is what makes the content real. It's the first-person data and experience that separates what gets ranked from what gets ignored. You can save that case study inside the system, so it's ready to reuse across future keywords in the same niche. Then you hit one button, generate five articles, and the Agent OS builds out five unique pieces of content around that keyword and deploys them to five different websites, all at the same time, all in the background, no CMS, no WordPress, no manually copying anything anywhere. And if you want to go even further into the terminal, you can do the exact same thing directly inside Claude Code. You give it the keyword and the case study, and Claude Code handles everything from writing to deployment without you being in the loop at all. That's the the in its simplest form. Now, let me walk you through exactly how we built it and why it works. Let me start with why most SEO efforts go nowhere. Most people follow the same playbook, open up a keyword tool, sort by volume, pick something that looks achievable, write a post, wait, nothing happens, write another one, wait again, still nothing. Here's the real reason that keeps happening. Tools like Ahrefs and SEMrush are showing you the same estimated data they show everyone else. Every competitor in your niche is looking at the same volume numbers, the same difficulty scores, the same keyword ideas. You're not finding hidden opportunities. You're just joining a very long queue of people chasing the same keywords. And in 2026, it's a slow way to lose. The new way starts with Claude Code. For anyone who hasn't come across it yet, Claude Code is Anthropic's command-line tool. It runs directly in your terminal. And here's the important thing, it doesn't just answer questions, it takes action. It can read your project files, write content, call APIs, run scripts, and deploy things to your website. It's a proper agentic tool, meaning it executes the work, not just describes it. And when you pair Claude Code with Google Search Console, you've got something that changes the whole SEO game. Here's the system we use. We call it the Goldy Demand Engine. Instead of pulling generic keyword data from third-party tools, we connect Claude directly to Google Search Console using the Google Workspace API. That means Claude is pulling your actual data, the keywords your sites are already showing up for, the impressions they're getting, the clicks, the positions. Real information from Google about your websites in your niche. Claude processes all of that and builds you a dashboard automatically. You can see your websites mapped out, how each one is performing, and a full breakdown of your top keywords. From there, it identifies the biggest opportunities, keywords you're already close to ranking for, existing content you can re-optimize to move up the rankings, and new angles worth targeting based on what's already working for you. And that's the core advantage here. The data you're working from is yours. Nobody else has access to your Google Search Console. Nobody else is finding opportunities based on your specific sites and your existing authority. While everyone else is competing for the same generic keywords from the same tools, you're going after the ones that are already relevant to you and within reach. We've run this system across a portfolio of websites. Sites that were brand new just a couple of months ago are already seeing consistent traction. One went from two clicks a day all the way up to 76. Another went from pretty much one click a day to over 200. And these aren't flukes. The trajectory is consistently upward because the keyword strategy is based on actual data, not guesswork. That's the Goldie Demand Engine. And Claude Code is one of the most powerful ways to actually run it at scale. Now, if you want someone to look directly at your site and show you exactly which keywords to target, how to re-optimize your existing content, and what to create next, you can grab a free SEO strategy session with us. We'll go through your site, analyze what's working, and put together a personalized SEO domination plan for you based on what's actually getting results right now. You can also ask questions live on the call and get real advice on link building for your specific niche. The link is in the description. go.juliangoldie.com/strategy -session. It's completely free. Inside the AI Profit Boardroom, we have the full system built out and ready to use. That includes the complete Agent OS as a zip file you can install straight away, the Goldie Demand Engine, the Keyword Research Agent, the Five-Article SEO Content Pipeline, the Kanban Agent Board, all the prompts, and a complete 30-day roadmap built specifically around this stack, so you know exactly what to do from day one. When you join right now, you also get walkthroughs specifically for connecting Claude Code to your Google Search Console, setting up the Obsidian Memory System, loading up the Agent OS SEO section, and running the full deployment pipeline from keyword all the way to live content. There are weekly live coaching calls where you can bring your setup, ask your questions, and get real feedback on what to fix. Daily tutorials updated based on what's working right now. And a community of people building and running these exact systems alongside you. If you want the whole stack without building it yourself, it's all waiting at aiprofitboardroom.com. Now, let's walk through how the actual workflow runs. Step one is finding the right keyword. Claude does this for you, but it works completely differently from a standard keyword tool, and that difference matters a lot. The reason Claude can pick better keywords for you is context. When you wire Claude code into a memory system like Obsidian, which we use as a second brain, your AI agent has real knowledge about you before it does anything. Your niche, your websites, your goals, the topics you already have authority on, all of that is available to Claude when it's doing your keyword research. So, instead of asking for generic keyword ideas, you're asking, "Given everything you know about me, my business, my audience, and my existing content, which keyword can I actually rank for right now?" That completely changes what comes back. Generic keyword tools optimize for search volume. Claude with context on you optimizes for your actual ability to win. That's a different game entirely, so, and it's why the keywords that come out of this system tend to be lower competition, higher relevance, and much more likely to perform in AI search engines like Perplexity and Google AI overviews, not just standard Google results. Step two is creating the content. Once you've got the keyword, you plug it into the content pipeline. And then, this is the part most people skip, you add first-person experience, a real case study, actual data, something that gives the content substance and makes it different from the generic AI content flooding the internet right now. Here's exactly how this works inside the Agent OS. You go into the SEO section, and you'll see the keywords Claude has already recommended based on your Search Console data. You pick the one you want to go after and plug it straight into the system. Then, and this is the key step, you find a case study you've already created that's relevant to that topic and plug that in, too. So, for example, if the target keyword is around Agentic OS mission control, you'd find a relevant case study on that topic, paste it in, and the system now has real first-person context to build the content around. You can also save that case study inside the system, so you can reuse it later across other keywords in the same niche. Then you hit generate five articles, and that's it. The Agent OS takes that keyword plus that case study and starts building content for every website in your portfolio simultaneously and deploying it. You're not just generating articles into a Google Doc. They're going live on your sites in the background while you move on to the next thing. And if you want to go even more hands-off, you can do the exact same thing directly inside Claude Code. You give Claude Code the keyword and the case study and it goes off and implements everything for you from the terminal. Same output, different interface, and both feed into the same pipeline. One keyword gets turned into five finished articles, each one unique, each targeting that keyword from a different angle, each deployed across a different website in your portfolio. Five separate ranking opportunities from one keyword, all created and published without you logging into WordPress once. Step is optimizing for the keyword. Title, description, content structure, keyword placement throughout. You make sure every signal is pointing at what you want to rank for. Claude Code handles the technical execution of the SE. It structures the content correctly and deploys it through your CMS API, so everything goes live, clean, and ready to rank. Step four is repurposing. This is where most people leave value on the table. You take that same content and push it out across more formats. A long-form blog post, a LinkedIn post, a podcast clip, a short video. Every additional format is another signal to Google and to AI search engines that you're a real authority on this topic. We've seen results where a single keyword is showing up in standard Google results, inside Perplexity recommendations, and in Google AI overviews across multiple different content formats at the same time. If you're completely new to SEO and want to build a solid foundation alongside the AI tools, how content strategy works, how to approach link building, what a good keyword looks like, we've got a free SEO course in the description with over 260 lessons. It covers everything you need to get started. Go check that out, too. The link is below. Now, if you want someone to look directly at your site and show you exactly which keywords to target, how to re-optimize your existing content, and what to create next, you can grab a free SEO strategy session with us. We'll go through your site, analyze what's working, and put together a personalized SEO domination plan for you based on what's actually getting results right now. You can also ask questions live on the call and get real advice on link building for your specific niche. The link is in the description, go.juliangoldie.com/strategy-session. And if you're ready to stop building from scratch and just run the system, the Agent OS zip file is inside the AI Profit Boardroom ready to install. You get the Claude code deployment workflows, the Goldie demand engine, the Agent OS SEO section with the full five article pipeline, the Kanban Agent Board, the Obsidian Second Brain setup, 100 example prompts, a step-by-step operating procedure, and a 30-day roadmap so every part of this makes sense in the right order. When you hit a wall, and you will because everyone does when they're setting this up, the coaching calls, the daily tutorials, and the community are there to get you through it fast. Go to aiprofitboardroom.com and get the system today.

---

Matt Diggity (Diggity Marketing)

[Music] sooner or later everyone and their mom is going to be leveraging AI for SEO but what will that mean for SEO professionals if SEO turns into spamming the AI button like a madman how will you compete AI development is moving fast and that's because the world wants it AI is cheaper than hiring writers it doesn't complain or get sick doesn't need time off when you desperately need to publish like crazy plus it's already being used in mass and it's only going to get better and if everyone has access to it how are you going to win that kind of environment the first very important differentiating factor will be topical Authority sure everyone can produce great SEO optimized content and on the cheap but do they know what content actually needs to be written so the name of the game will be who can figure out everything that needs to be written in a given Niche this is called creating a topical map thanks for watching and remember to subscribe for more videos just like this one

---

Liam Dunne (Discovered Labs)

All right. So, what is answer engine optimization? Also known as AEO. Some people like to call it GEO. That's what I'm going to try answer in this video. So, I'm going to cover why AI search is not just SEO 2.0. The three activities that are going to move your AI visibility, not just to get you citations or mentions, but actually help you become the recommended solution to your buyers when they're prompting these LLMs. And all of this is going to be grounded in real experience and lessons from doing this for B2B SAS companies. Some of the companies you can see on the screen here. So some proof to share that this stuff works. Uh so incident.io, they're a series B SAS company increased their organic meetings booked by 22%. Uh took their AI visibility from 38 to 64% as a leading indicator perspective. But of course this is the stuff that people care about. So, uh, they're a series A B2B SAS company, increased their organic demos by 167% in four weeks of going live. Organic is now their number one pipeline channel, uh, year to date. And then an anonymous B2B SAS company, they're doing tens of millions in ARR. When we first started working with them at the very beginning, we took them from roughly 575 free trials per month to over 3.7K free trials per month measured via self-reported attribution of people saying, "Hey, we heard about you in LLMs. We have since taken more ownership of their organic search strategy. Here is some, I guess, snippets or testimonials of clients who have worked with us. Here are some logos of the companies that are working with us. And here are some screenshots of Google Search Console of companies who we run organic search for. So, two and a half million clicks, last 12 months, 20, let's round up to 21 million, 1.3 million, and 1.2 million. And then, if this is the first time you're watching a video of mine uh on the channel, quick intro. So, my background is almost exclusively B2B uh demand generation. So, I've helped companies like instantly.ai, I big cold email platform uh scale from 500K to 20 million ARR in 3 years completely bootstrapped whereas Ben my co-founder at discovered labs uh he studied rocket science at Stanford and has built using transformers which are a core architecture behind LLMs like chat GBT or claude. So combining those two skill sets at discovered labs ultimately we provide organic search services to series A plus B2B SAS companies that includes both SEO and the AI search um but using the in-house technical skills that we have. So we have a um a team of three on the engineering side. We regularly research how these LLMs behave and then we use those findings to develop our methodology, build internal tools that help our clients win against their competitors and then take a small slice of that and share it in content uh as well. So jumping into it. So you'll likely get most value out of this video uh if you run Martin at a B2B SAS. And the reason being is that's my bias. So I've pretty much only worked uh with a B2B SAS company. So everything I'm going to talk through in this video is going to be through that lens. I think there'll still be stuff that is applicable to other industries and niches, but there might be um better videos on on YouTube for those. And then secondly, perhaps you're already um feeling the impact of AI search. You're getting some AI referral traffic. Um you're getting some leads or signups and conversions of people saying they came across you from LLMs, but you're not really sure why that's happening. So my aim in this video will be to perhaps provide some clarity as to what you can do, some tactics you can use to um get more of those. Now this video is a follow on from a video I did uh probably over eight months ago um that you can see on the channel. 75 minutes went um into a lot of detail. You know, eight months ago, I've learned a lot of lessons since then and I've updated my priors. And so really this is like a refresh sharing some new perspectives that I have um from um our experience working with clients over the last eight plus months. So um as I said at the beginning AEO is not SEO 2.0. Now this is our point of view. Uh I'm not saying it's the gospel truth. Um but we believe this to be true. And the TLDDR of that position is ultimately SEO and AO share the same foundation. uh we're not saying the wildly different things. Um and the reason being is the activity categories such as technical on page and off- page um largely overlap as well as the fundamentals that make any marketing channel successful largely overlap right things like your brand your positioning having a deep understanding of your ICP having differentiators and communicating them through your messaging right all that stuff is kind of there's a large overlap um between SEO and AO however the underlying systems are different, right? Open AAI and Anthropic and other companies are very well, they're different companies to Google, right? They build similar but different technologies and they're all incentivized through different you know business models etc. And so the downstream behaviors are different which impacts us marketers of you know how we um try to win across these channels. So to give a simple comparison, if you look at Google, you search a query, usually like a short head term and in return you get a list of uh 10 links or or 10 documents whereas in LLM's a query goes in which is usually a longer prompt. Uh in most cases it's conversational just because it's a chatbased uh UI and then you get a regenerated answer back to you that is influenced by different things than the Google SER is. You know, one specific example would be personalization, right? They build up this memory graph of you and they know, oh, okay, Liam is an agency founder doing this amount of revenue. He has these problems. This is where he's geographically based and that really influences the answer as well as the LLM's reasoning chain itself behaves differently to Google SER, right? And so these systems are using different uh functions and they're using different math to um to to extract to uh evaluate and score content enough to change the tactical priorities. Right? That that is our core positioning. Lots of overlap but there is enough difference to warrant as marketers or founders to change your tactical priorities if you want the most optimal strategy in those channels. Right? And so that tactical um difference might be small. It could be 5% 10% 20%. You know, I don't have a firm answer on that. But in my opinion, in any competitive market like B2B SAS where I am, where I don't think it's been more competitive than it is right now, then in my opinion, that's where the edge lives, right? It's like you look at cold email, if everyone has access to these automated tools and like clay and they can personalize every email, then well, if everyone's doing that, then how do I stand out? How do I gain an edge, right? We're thinking about that from an organic search perspective as well. So, we give like a real simple comparison between SEO and AEO. So, in a uh sorry, in SEO, we're ranking a whole page, right? You search a query, you get a full page returned, and you have to click that page and uh well, click through to that page and consume the information. Whereas in AEO, a passage of text uh like a block of text is being retrieved and combined with other passages of text and then you receive a regenerated answer back. That's very different behavior. In SEO, we're targeting keywords, right? Whereas in AO, we're targeting prompts. Uh a much longer tail in distribution um that we can capture. And in my opinion, this is um one of the biggest advantages for startups because now there's such a larger distribution. there's more surface area where we can compete whereas Google SER historically has been very competitive and incumbents um become entrenched in SEO historically authority has been weighted towards backlinks due to page rank that waiting has changed over time but um it's still very much you know if you want to increase your domain authority to improve your rankings in Google SER then you know backlinks is the way to do that the mechanism to do that in AO authority is weighted towards cross-source agreement, right? So, I'll get into that. It's far less about having do follow links, you know, links that just go to your website. It's it's far more about what is the actual message contained in association to your company and does that align with what you're saying, right? And this is really important for B2B SAS companies where there's just a lot of complexity, right? You have this large platform that splits out into all these different capabilities or or product modules that have all these different features that do all these different things that translates to, you know, how you communicate messaging and your differentiators. There's just there's just so much surface area that is constantly changing every quarter as you ship new features and and as you update your priors and you know target different market segments etc. And so that just creates a lot of surface area on the internet that needs to be managed, right? And the best way I think about this is like imagine um uh a sales rep from your company pitching a prospect and they were just using information that was 6 months old features that you had six months ago. Your product has completely changed. That is those are the stakes in AI search with regards to B2B SAS, right? Is the information that your buyers are receiving in these LLMs relevant, accurate, um, and recent? In SEO, we're um, ultimately we're we're trying to rank pages in search results. Now, um, I know the ultimate business goal is to generate more organic sourced pipeline ultimately, but from a channel objective, it is to uh, rank pages in search results because then the understanding is you'll get discovered more. people will click through to your website and the conversion will happen there. Whereas in AEO the goal is to help companies get recommended in LLMs. Right? So for um from my perspective it's not to get citations, it's not to get mentions, it's so that when my ideal customers are searching things in chat GBT that have commercial intent, i.e. they're evaluating solutions or they're looking to make a decision, they're in market, I want to be the recommended choice. Now, citations mentions are kind of leading indicators to help us to get get to that north star, but ultimately that's what it's about um for us. Now, I did do a long form article on our website. Maybe I'll link it in the description um if you prefer written content. So, um and then a quick thing here, I actually raised this in my in my last video, but there's a lot of skepticism about AI search at the moment. Actually in general there's a lot of skepticism about AI at a macro level and I would just encourage you to be cautious of public opinion on change. There's a lot of convergent thinking that's happening at the moment particularly in the SEO industry where people are just default skeptical and it almost seems like they're not open they're not even open to updating um you know their their previous biases. Whereas if you look at when the internet was becoming a thing, people are also skeptical about the internet, right? Saying it's a fad and millions of people are giving up on it, right? And you can easily translate this to how people are talking about AI today. And so I just encourage you to sort of maybe do your own research and think for yourself because it's very easy particularly if convergent thinking is happening because then it's the majority of people talking about the same thing and all being skeptical together. It's really easy to fall victim to the group think. Um, and I hope to change your mind uh, in this video. All right, so let's talk about the three areas where I think things are breaking at the moment for organic search strategy. So ultimately how I would summarize this is that most companies are still running the old SEO playbook and thinking it's optimal for the AI search area, which I believe to be uh, a fallacy, right? And the reason being is to give you an analogy. If you were running LinkedIn ads, the way you would measure success for that channel is not um if you were getting some clicks to your landing pages and if you were getting some conversions. How you would measure the success of that channel is you would look at those as leading indicators. But ultimately, you would care about channel efficiency, right? You'd look at your CPM. How much is it costing us to get in front of, you know, a thousand eyeballs? Um how much we paying for those clicks to our, you know, so cost per click. You'd look at cost per acquisition and then you'd look at your CAC LTV ratio for that channel or your CAC payback to understand okay for every dollar I put into this channel how much am I getting out that's how we approach paid marketing right whereas I think what's happened in organic search is people um with either an existing or a new SEO strategy are getting AI referral traffic they're getting leads or signups um where people say hey we found you um from an LM and so they take that as panel validation. They take that as validation that okay, what we're doing on the SEO side is optimal for AEO, right? But as in the paid example I gave, just because you're getting clicks and conversions does not mean you're squeezing that channel for as much juice as possible. And really, that's my core argument here as someone who's, you know, interested in demand generation is I care about channel efficiency. I don't want to just do an okay job. I want to create a money machine where I put $1 in and I get two, three, four, five, $10 out. Right? Ultimately for me that's what it boils down to. And so I think there are three areas where things are breaking at the moment. Number one is on the people side. So ultimately AI search is a black box at the moment right open AI or anthropic are not telling us hey this many people are searching for these prompts right and so there is this sort of black box where we don't really know what people are searching for. We're forming a hypothesis and we're saying okay we're going to track these prompts. We're going to use software or a homegrown solution like ours to track those prompts and then we're going to create content that targets those prompts, right? But nobody, none of these providers are telling us that's exactly what people are searching for. In contrast to SEO where we have Google search console where literally tells us what people are searching for. We have G4 which is a Google product, you know, um so Google owns the channel, they own the the software attribution as well. And then we have tools like HF, Semratch, etc., which ultimately are third party software and not never going to be 100% accurate, but there's a lot more to enable us on the SEO side in comparison to AO, right? And so what we're seeing at the moment is a lot of companies are just being fooled by randomness, right? They're basically outsourcing their AO strategy to a $50 to $100 a month AI visibility tool. Um, which our research has found a lot of these tools have measurement flaws, right? So there's really like a one a lack of um measurement into whether the strategy is working, but I think it's generally a lack of LLM understanding as well, right? And that's not me saying we have all the answers. By the way, like I said, it's a black box, early stages of maturity, but I think there's this pandemic of companies or people not doing a lot of research and really basing their strategy based on what people are talking about on LinkedIn, right? Where there's a a different flavor every week. List calls are good. good listicles are bad, Reddit is good, Reddit is bad. They're basically informing their AO strategy on best practices and a lot of people who are posting this content, you know, are default skeptical of AI. And so there's bias included in these studies, right? And so I think downstream how this is impacting is a lot of companies just don't have the optimal strategy for AI search. And then if we look at the systems and mechanics side of things, right, again, we're dealing with different systems here, deterministic and non-deterministic systems, right? And so a lot of people are informed in their AI search strategy just as they would with SEO, right? They do some keyword research and they create some content and they get some backlinks and because that is getting them some results, some AI referral traffic and conversions, they assume, great, we're doing the right things, right? Where we have found that not to be true. Um, we have, you know, a lot of cases with our with our um with our customers where they were succeeding on the SEO front, maybe position one or top five for commercial terms on Google, but they were losing in LLMs because they weren't structuring their content the right way. They weren't approaching off- page in the right way. So, there are some technical considerations there. I think people are just being fooled by random data uh at the moment um and assuming that because they're getting some results that they have the optimal strategy. Now, our view is that we're not looking at this as like SEO versus AO, you know, head-to-head battle. Like I said at the beginning, we provide organic search services. We do SEO and AO. We don't necessarily have a dog in the fight. Um but how we view organic search and we think this is um how things are going to be moving forward is through three surface areas. So the first surface area is being discoverable via web search right. So this is traditionally where um uh well where traditional SEO played right? So being discoverable via humans humans searching the web whereas we think it needs to be that but also being discoverable via agents right because agents also conduct web searches. So in an LLM sense during the query fan out process when um they need to get fresh information right so the focus areas here are your onpage content is it structured is it optimal um for these agents and then technical can these agents access your website is your website performant is it AI ready can they you know they're not consuming content like a human um and so is your website optimal for this new you know gatekeeper of the internet the second surface area is being optimized for citations. So these are rich, verifiable and consistent facts that can be corroborated by others. Now we view this as a new surface area. Pre um in SEO, one of the main activities was getting back links. Now of course marketers ruin everything. Um you know that the from a first principal perspective it makes sense. Um your one of the factors of um Google ranking your content is through page rank. like if others are linking back to your content and talking about your content that probably means it's it's a good piece of content but then of course marketers gain the system whereas in AEO it's less about how many links are pointing to your pages or your overall domain and it's more about how you describe yourself which is obviously going to be in a positive light are others um also describing you that way and saying positive things and saying yeah that's where you win and your competitors lose right it's more about that the links are a bonus but it's more about the actual message that is associated with your domain. So the focus here is on page content as well um because we need to first of all have our POV on our on our website you know what makes us different who do we integrate with who do we compete with what are our features capabilities benefits etc. We need to have that ground truth but then also off- page and earned authority taking that message and distributing it off page so we have that consistency. Then third, which is where the sort of long-term defensibility is going to come from, is being secured in the training data. So getting our most important facts baked into the model itself. So future versions already know your company. So the focus areas here are off-page and earned authority, right? Um OpenAI has well I'm going to use Open AAI as the main example because they're the biggest um platform might change. Um so you can assume when I'm talking about open AAI I'm talking about the other um uh platforms as well but a lot of these platforms have deals with publishers and the reason being is because these LLMs uh or or AI is not some uh you know intelligent being right it's artificial intelligence it has to get that information from somewhere and usually it's getting that information from publishers it's getting it from corpora right so published texts and research right if I was an alien and I visited Earth and I wanted to learn um some fundamental truths of Earth. I wouldn't be reading LinkedIn posts, right, or Twitter posts. I'd be reading peer-reviewed research papers. I would be reading books, stuff like that that tend to be a little less bias um and and a bit more dense, right? A lot of these LLMs are trained on these um um places of information, right? So to be secured in the training data, we want to be in these places that these LLMs are are pulling from, right? And you can see some news reels here that I've pulled where these models or these AI companies are being, you know, sued by these publishers for um, you know, training their models on their information uh, in many cases without permission. Right? So when we're talking about training data, we're talking about this thing at the top, right? So user inputs query um, and then the LLM, you know, does query fan out process. It's going through its reasoning chain, but where it gets information from is number one, from its training data. like can I answer this question right away from what I already know or do I need to go out to the web and find recent information using rag that I can pull in to give a an accurate answer um to uh to the user and so how we think about the core activities of AO like I said there are roughly three of them um I have missed technical from this um it's uh personally what I find the most exciting um but I also think it's the one that's most similar to just like good old technical SEO and so there's enough information out on the web on that. Um but with WebMCP being released I do think that there will be a lot of changes. Um anyways the core activities so we have measurement so building and measuring what we call your prompt universe. So we're going to map what your ICP actually asks AI and then we're going to benchmark yourself against your competitors at a global level so we can see how often you're showing up or not showing up but then also break that down to the topics that you actually care about. Right. The second area is on page. So ensuring that uh content is structured for retrieval. So optimize for LLMs without hurting the human reader experience. So I'm really tried to hit this point home. How we think about organic search is yes, we want you to win in LLMs, but we want to do that without sacrificing other search surface areas, right? Like I don't think Google's going to go anywhere. Don't think um people are going to stop searching information on Google. And so we don't want to um help you win in LLMs uh in a way that's going to hurt uh also your Google performance or your YouTube performance or any other search surface error. Right? So when we think about onpage content, we want it yes optimal to be to be optimal for LLM retrieval, but also we want it to be optimal for the human reader as well, right? We want to increase engagement and dwell time um so that Google says yes, this is a this is a high quality piece of content. Um it can rank well. And then from an off- page perspective, building that consistency and authority, right? So narrative consistency across the web plus going to talk about Reddit, which I believe to be the channel that most B2B companies are overlooking and we're going to provide evidence of of why I think that. So let's jump into measurement, the first activity. Um, so for many cases, AI visibility is invisible to your current measurement stack, right? So the old way is tracking organic search exclusively through Google Search Console, G4 and maybe a rank tracker like HS or Semrush. And you treat these as the source of truth for how you show up in search. Now why this is not optimal is because for most companies, not all companies, we're seeing clicks go down. We're seeing impressions up. And everyone's wondering why that's happening, right? And the reason why that's happening is because zero-click research, right? A lot of people are now consuming information from it could be from your website in places like these LLMs or it could even be at a a grander scale in private communities, social media, etc. And so there's less reason to click through to your website. And so that's why we're seeing clicks go down. And then we also uh include more tactical things like SER features, you know, AI overviews, things like that, which are going to push those organic um uh pieces of content down lower. effectively marketers are just being crushed from all angles and it's really hard to measure the impact of our organic search activities and it's also really hard to have that conversation you know there's a lot of education that has to happen internally with like our stakeholders of like no like this is not the end of the world like this is why these things are happening and so we think the new way if you want to um understand how you're showing up and and how you're winning or losing in LLMs is to build what we call a prompt universe so similar to like a keyword universe, that universe of keywords that you want to track. But for AI search, we're doing prompts. Ideally, you're going to ground that in first party data. So, going back to the other point I made where um OpenAI isn't telling us, hey, a million people search for this prompt. And so, rather than just using purely synthetic prompts, I I think this is what people are searching, what we want to do is we want to analyze our first party data, sales call transcripts, onboarding calls, etc. So what is that customer language that is being used? How do they describe us and our category? And then use that to generate our prompts. We're going to run that prompt universe across the main LLMs. Um and then we're going to essentially scrape what comes back. We're going to scrape the answers. And then we're going to track our mention rate, how often are we being mentioned, citation rate, how often are our URLs being cited. And then we're going to track our share of voice, which is well, we use a weighted metric that kind of combines um how often you're being mentioned, cited as well as average rank to understand, okay, you know, how do we how do we show up um in these answers? And then why this matters is because we want a continuously updating view of where we stand against our competitors, right? Yes. Um, zero click research is happening. Yes. Uh, these LLMs are a bit of a black box, but it's not really acceptable for us to say to our internal stakeholders and just lay down our tools and be like, "Oh, well, we can't measure it, so we're just going to give up, right? We need some indication. It might not be perfect, but we need some indication of how we're showing up in these LLMs." Really every downstream decision whether it be on page content, off-page activities, technical of you know how we structure our website is going to be informed by this data rather than guesses rather than best practices because that's how we always did it in SEO. And as you see here, this is a recent study we did. We're actually about to launch sort of a landmark study uh next week. So today's the 9th of May. I'll try to link that in the description. um we found that AI queries are almost four times longer than traditional search queries, right? So there's just a far longer tale of distribution that we need to capture, right? So if we're just if we're just um tracking, you know, head terms that are one to one to five words in lengths, then we're just going to miss out on the queries that people are probably actually searching in um LLMs. And so the downstream consequence of that is our content is going to be targeting the wrong queries and our topic selection is going to be a bit skewed. So how do we think about uh sorry how do we do measurement? So the first activity is we want to map that prompt universe. Right? So first of all keywords are not prompts. Keywords in our understanding are what people type into Google. Prompts are what they ask um uh these chatbased um LLMs. However really prompts are made up of keywords, right? They're just longer in there's a longer tail and usually there's multiple of them in one conversation, right? Usually they're more situational. So when somebody searches something on Google, it's usually like, you know, best CRM, best CRM for B2B SAS or something like that. Whereas when somebody talks with an AI, they're like, "Hey, I'm a SAS founder. We're doing 5 million revenue this year. We're trying to hit uh 10 million in the next two years. Um we have a team of two sales reps. uh we're looking for a CRM where we can do a free trial to test it out ourselves. Oh, and it must integrate with um with this attribution software because we use that like just such um there just such a bigger amount of context which the LLM then uses to you know during its career fan out process search for relevant information. Right? So we want to try to capture all of that. So in the prompt it's going to be like I'm a SAS founder looking for a CRM. I'm looking for a CRM that has uh a free trial that I can use. You know, those are the type of prompts that we're going to track. Ideally, we want to ground these prompts in first party data um not keyword volume. Now, I will caveat that by saying keyword volume can be useful as a proxy. Like ultimately, if I sell um a CRM software, you can probably assume that people that like tracking the prompt best CRM software is probably like a decent prompt to track, right? Um, so you know, um, use some judgment there, but just because there's keyword volume for a keyword and href does not mean we should be tracking that as a prompt, right? Really ground this in reality with first party data. Interview your customers. Um, analyze your sales call transcripts, you know, um, as I said here, what I like to do is I use Granola. Uh, they have a nice MCP and I just connect to that and I run, I don't know if it's weekly or monthly schedule where I'm analyzing those call transcripts. What were the FAQs, frequently asked questions? um you know what were the sort of jobs to be done that people cared about what were some of the problems why did they choose us over competitors I'm always trying to pull that rich context and then that gets fed into our content um our prompts uh etc Ideally want to target 100 to 300 prompts um because we just want more data right and this is this is one of the considerations um of uh this this blackbox effect is we want to apply statistical rigor whereby if we're just tracking 10 prompts, that's not going to be very representative of what you know your ideal customers are searching. So in theory, the more prompts we have, the more data we get back, the the higher confidence we can have in that data that we're not just being fooled by randomness. And this is, if I would say, one of the key considerations when buying these AI visibility trackers is how many prompts they allow you to track, right? because some of them don't allow you to track a lot and you could just that the data you're getting back is just not going to be statistically uh significant. We then want to run those prompts across uh these trackers. Uh this is a screenshot of our own platform that we've built. Um so you know I've talked a lot about the technical specifics here. You could just buy a software to do it yourself. Uh we we test across uh chat GPT, Claude, Gemini, um even Google AI overviews and it's much better to use a software than to do this yourself like i.e. go to chatg.com and like hey what's the best you know CRM company um because one that's not going to be statistically significant and two we have that personalization bias where a lot of these models build up these memories of you you can view this in the settings where they know who you are they know what you care about they know that you know uh you're crying yourself to sleeper every night and the problems you're having in your life and so the answer that you get back is going to be influenced by that memory your buyers probably don't have the same issues or same concerns or same situation as you right so it's just not going to be apples to apples and then yeah so kind of um bury the lead here but LLMs are probabilistic right so you may get fooled this is huge and I think uh not enough companies are paying attention to this right if you go to chatg.com now and ask uh the same prompt 10 times you're probably going to get 10 different answers they're probably not going to be too dissimilar but there are going to be some permutations right the the company that was position one might now move to position two or the actual text of how they describe company one might slightly be varied, right? It's you're not getting the same answer every single time. And so therefore, don't, you know, ask track, hey, what's the best, you know, uh, insert category term for insert ICP and just take verbatim what it's given back to you, right? You want to log the distribution. So, we calculate mention rate, citation rate, share of voice, and we also apply uh sort of confidence intervals of okay, how confident can we be with this data? So this is inside our platform uh prompt universe. So you run it across multiple models, multiple sessions, multiple sonas and then effectively you get a distribution right that you can map out. So here we've got 300 prompts. You can see the different topics there. I blurred them out here. Um and here we can see the margin of error for each topic, right? So 7% as low down to 4%. So we ideally we want this to be low as possible. We try to keep it under 10%. because any more than that we start to distrust the data um that we're getting back and then how we think about measurement through a threeprong approach. Um clearly see um I'm not trying to win any design awards with these slides. Um so from a top of funnel perspective like leading indicators we want to measure share of voice mention rate citation rate. This is going to help you understand how you're showing up um in these LLMs. And more importantly, you want to break this down not just at a global level, but um by the topic clusters or pillars that you care about, right? So for this topic, you know, this is how uh we benchmark against competitors. For this topic, this is how we benchmark against competitors because really that's going to inform your your uh your strategy because then you know where you're winning or losing and and either what you need to double down on or or what you need to fix. middle of funnel, we still want to track even though in an era of zero-click research, right? People probably are still going to find their way into um our owned assets. So, we like to track AI referred traffic, you know, are people clicking through those citations through to our website? Uh clicks of course um and then brand search lift. So, one of the um I guess implications of zeroclick research is people might not um you know uh click through citations or click through content onto our website. They actually might come back either going direct because there's brand recall. They remember who we were. Oh, I saw that website. I saw that company on LinkedIn or in an LLM or on an ad. Uh this was their, you know, this was their their name. I'm going to search that on Google. that will come through in your software as a brand search or they might go direct and enter your URL if you have a uh your URL is easy to remember right and so we also want to keep an eye on that because this is this is definitely where people can get fooled where you know as a marketer ultimat usually in on the search side we're measured by non-branded traffic but if we do our job well in these LLMs in these surface areas that are harder to measure our branded search should be increasing our direct traffic should be increasing this is one of the things I noticed when I was running paid ads for instantly is magically uh when we were uh putting a lot lot of money into ads our direct and our branded search was increasing significantly and I call this the halo effect where people remember you they might see your ad on their mobile but they don't visit your website on their mobile within that same session and device they go to their laptop maybe after the lunch break or you know at the end of the day and that's going to be measured as a different session on a different device that connection of the ad to that they viewed that impression completely disconnected. Um this is a reax that you can throw into J4. Uh so this is a report we set up for clients to measure AR referral traffic. So here you can see about 12 a half thousand um uh users coming from um uh LLM directly clicking through which is a large number right and I would I mean it's hard to give an exact number but I would say only 1 to 2% of people are actually clicking through these LLMs right most people they get the answer they're happy they don't need to click through now uh quick ad break um so if this is all sounding interesting and you just want to work with a company that solves this for you so Like I said at the beginning, uh we provide end-to-end services specifically for B2B SAS series A+ and we help them win against Google and AI search. So we cover all search surface areas. Like I said, we have an in-house engineering team. We're actually about a team of 20 and we have uh three full-time um AI ML engineers that conduct research and development and build custom tools for us, our clients and workflows. And we have proven results, right? So we have public case studies on the website that you can view out. So it's done for you. We're not just using N's API and uh you know botched together prompts in chat GBT. We're actually building software based on R&D um custom workflows done for you and we're not just informing our methodology based on what people are talking about on LinkedIn or Reddit this week. We try to actually understand how these LLMs behave and also from a Google perspective what changes are happening there and then our methodology is is built upon that. So if that sounds interesting, just go to discoverlabs.com and you'll be talking with me. All right, moving on. So let's talk about on page. Um, so this I think this is a topic that jars people the most if I'm being honest and I I think I cover it here in a sec. Yeah. So one of the I guess consequences and I don't say that in a negative way of um us being uh what I would say as like a technical agency where we have you know engineers and we have a big like engineer and ops culture is ultimately how Google and these LLMs view your content is not like a human does right they use math to evaluate your content right these are uh these are systems they're not humans right and so we really view AEO content as is a math challenge. Um, and that jars people because I think people don't like hearing that. It's like, oh, we should create, you know, beautiful artistic content that people love. And I don't disagree with that, but ultimately the discipline of um SEO is search engine optimization. We're optimizing for search engines, right? That is the job of an SEO and we view it the exact same on the AEO side. So, we think the old way of doing this is low volume, exclusively human written content that's targeted at keywords from search volume tools. Um, now why this is not optimal because you're probably going to be targeting the wrong questions because keywords are not prompts. And if you're exclusively getting people to write your content, then it's probably not going to be optimal for these LLMs, right? Because they're grading your content using math and humans are just naturally not good at doing that. And that's why everyone uses tools like Surfer, Jasper, Phrase, etc., right? So you'll actually find that a lot of agencies who say they only use human writers, the human will write the first draft and then they'll throw that into a tool like surf SEO which is using uh um AI. So the new way of doing this, we want to target a prompt universe. We want to structure content that's beneficial for both humans, right, and LLMs because you go too far on the other end, you're going to have issues. So it reads like a person wrote it, but it's structured for the retrieval pipeline and these LLMs can extract it, right? So we call this AI assisted human in the loop with guardrails, right? We're not just exclusively using AI to create a bunch of slop or just like walls of text that are like super super dense and optimal for LLMs because then we're going to impact the human reader experience and then that's going to you know eventually your website is going to get yonked uh by Google. But go too far to the other side of exclusively human written content. It you might create great thought leadership and it will help you on that side of things. But if we're thinking about search specifically, which I am looking at it through that lens, it's not going to be optimal. Now, I think there is um I'm not saying exclusively human written content and thought leadership is bad. That's not my uh position here. Um now, why this matters is every passage. So, we talk about AEO we're extracting passages is scored multiple times for an answer is generated. Right? So, it's a game of probability. The content is getting scored. The LM's going okay is this similar to the query? You know, can I trust this source? And it goes through uh re-ranking a reranking process, right? And something we found is that these systems are in uh in constant demand for fresh information, right? When um you ask a question like a longer tail prompt to an LLM and it does it query fanout process, it's looking at hundreds maybe thousands of sources of information um which is a huge surface area for one uh user query. And we found that sometimes the recency of that information can impact the probability of your content being pulled in. There's actually a study, I'm not sure if it's one of these, can't remember off the top of my head, where they just changed the publish date on a piece of content and they were um able to improve the performance of that content by up to 25%. Right? So there is a a belief that there is a recency bias from these LLMs, but that might change um over time. The TLDDR there is this is not just like Google where you search a query and there's 10 pages of content and like that's it. You know in in LM you search a prompt they're looking at thousands hundreds of pieces of content. Sometimes they're adding search operators like 2025 2026 to f explicitly find recent content and so the demand is just far greater. Now a common thing I hear people say is like oh um AI generated content is bad. It's just not true. um you're just throwing the baby out with the the bath water. So, Google itself, as you can see here, states that they don't care if your content is AI generated, right? Rewarding highquality content, however it is produced. I'll focus on the quality of content rather than how the content is produced. Okay? So, the problem is not AI itself. The problem is lowquality content. Okay? And so, if your content is flagged as low quality, then it's more of a process problem. It's not AI the tool. Okay? lowquality content existed far um sorry existed long before tools like chat GBT became popular right so don't throw the baby out with the bath water and this is why relying on what people are saying on places like LinkedIn we're like listicles are bad well no listicles aren't bad it's actually a really uh effective content format what is bad is overly self-promotional listicles that were clearly written using AI that are only internally linking to other pages don't have any information gain, right? There's nothing novel that is being um published. That's bad, right? So, it's a uh um a quality issue, not a format issue. And so, we view these as like competing forces, right? You have like the pure human craft and then the sort of pure AI optimization. Ideally, the sweet spot is in the middle. Um so, pure human craft is like subject matter expertise, original POVs and voice, uh brand trust and narrative coherence, right? And what this wins is trust perception. There is just some psychological thing where if something is created by a human, it just we have more trust, right? It's like why people buy um organic meat even though most of these companies are greenwashing and doing dodgy things. If it has an organic logo on it, we're happy to pay the premium, right? Because we the same as like handmade um things like handmade candles. Uh people are can charge a lot of money for them because it wasn't just made in a factory, it was made by a person. there is this perception of trust. Um whereas on the pure AI optimization side, this is where we view it more through a mathematical lens, right? So information gain, entity density, right? Passage structure, scale and speed, we can just create more content and we while maintaining the quality bar, right? Because get a person to write 10 articles, you know, [snorts] two to 3,000 word articles tomorrow, they're going to burn out and um the quality is going to start to diminish. that's not really going to happen with uh right systems. Um and it's just going to it's just going to be more optimized for these systems, right? So what it wins is scale plus retrieval readiness. But go too far to that end of the scale, that's where it it just becomes a bit jarring, right? People can read it and like this is written by AI, I don't trust this content. I'm not going to read it. That's going to uh negatively impact you in the long term. So the sweet spot is somewhere in the middle where we're bringing in that subject matter expertise. We're bringing in those original POVs. We're bringing in that first party information that you've uh collected from you know uh speaking with your customers but we're also using uh a system we're using AI assistance to scale that output to also optimize the content of like okay you know we need to make it mathematically uh optimized rather than just purely you know human written pros right so we think um the sweet spot is somewhere in the middle all right so how do we think about topic selection i.e deciding what pieces of content we're going to publish from an on-page perspective. So this is why I think looking at things just from a global level i.e. is our mention rate, citation rate, share of voice is not good enough. We want to get down as close to the bare metal as possible, right? Like what are the individual URLs that are um driving impact? What are the drivers, right? So this is a screenshot from our platform where we break the analytics down by topic cluster and so you can see here we can see that um obviously it's blurred so it's a bit more harder to see but we can see um basically the share of voice differs per these topic clusters right so ideally we want this to be all these numbers to be high but this just helps us pinpoint okay where are we winning or losing and then we can go a layer deeper right we can drill down further of okay well for this topic pick what prompts are we tracking and then for an individual prompt what sources are being cited what companies are being mentioned right so we want to keep drilling down until we get to the bare metal of okay what do I need to do to improve the performance here right so you can see this screenshot here we've got a prompt at the top and we're filtering by share of voice so this is a competitor and alternative cluster we can see all the runs that have been returned here where we've gone out and tested across these um models and then we can see we flag when the client has been mentioned when they've been cited when they have been mentioned what position are they and then the number of citations we can actually click through to the raw response and similar to as you would perform a SER analysis of okay for this query what content is ranking best and you go oh this content's ranking position one I wonder why what's the metadata the type like the H1 the meta description etc you know what's the word count the keyword density right that's typically how SER analysis works exact same concept, but we're informing it by our AEO measurement rather than what's happening um in Google SER. So, what we want to do is basically make this decision tree of okay, this content is performing the best. Do we have that content? No, that's a topic gap. All right, we're going to add that to our content road map. Oh, we do have that topic, but uh we're underperforming. Okay, do we need to refresh that content to make it perform better? Right, so this is sort of how we inform the on page uh road map. It could also be um oh it's um the dominant content format is um pricing pages or product pages or solution pages or integration pages. Do we have that? No. Okay, we need to create one of those. Do we have that? Yes. Oh, okay. We need to refresh it to make it more optimal. Right? So that's how we think about uh from an on-page perspective content creation. So very early on we created the citable framework. So this is based on our research. It's also based on anthropic and Google research. And it just gives us a rubric for effectively creating content that's optimal for LLM retrieval while not sacrificed in the human reader experience. Right? So none of this is like crazy, you know, witch magic. Um it's really just taking a mathematical lens to content to ensure that it's optimal. Um if you go to our website to free tools, we actually have a content evaluator where just throw in your content. It's free and we'll score it across these dimensions um and you'll get actionable steps to to improve your content. If you want this accessible via like an API or MCP, let us know. I wonder if that um would be useful. So, how we think about content quality because we do use AI assistance. we built, you know, internal tech um because we just weren't happy with the tools out there because I think I mean it's my perspective, take it with a grain of salt, but just found um it just all the content kind of comes out the same. So, we score content uh we reddraft content. So, okay, is this content still aligned with the company? Is it still aligned with the persona we're targeting? Is it still aligned with the brief? Um is it still aligned with the intent of the the prompts or the queries that we're tracking? Is it still aligned with the citable framework? Right? So, we're constantly scoring the content and reddrafting it. We're doing factchecking. So, we do this from a programmatic perspective. If you say, "Hey, uh, competitor A's pricing is $50 a month," we will, um, that claim will be removed from the content if we can't find a primary source, aka the competitor's pricing page explicitly saying that's their pricing, right? Because when you use AI, sometimes these models rely on outdated information which means you then get sort of hallucinations in your content, right? So we do that from a programmatic perspective and also a manual perspective. We have an editorial team of eight to eight to nine people um all with English degrees and SEO experience and so they also have their process for going through and and evaluating the content. We're pulling in user generated content and social proof. So you can see here this is one of our client workspaces where there are you know almost 700 pieces of user generated content and social proof that we're pulling in right so this could be anything like YouTube videos um related to I well either owned or earned um it could be reviews from various review websites it could be discussions that are happening naturally on Reddit it could be sometimes clients will just give us access to their call recorders and we'll pull those insights and push them to our platform and so what we're doing is We're embedding that into the content, right? Because at citation time using the agree style framework, LLM are trying to verify claims, right? And so if you say you're better than competitor A because ABC, if you can support that claim with a piece of userenerated content, somebody saying, "Yep, I signed up because they're better than competitor A than because of ABC," you're going to increase the probability of um you you know, your content um passing the checks. But then also from a good old SEO perspective, if we're embedding, you know, UGC or videos into the uh onto the content and users are engaging with that, then that's going to increase dwell time. That's a positive ranking signal for Google, right? So we're trying to think about it from all these different angles. And of course, all of this is sort of wrapped around with context engineering. So cool transcripts, brand docs, persona docs, etc. So everything is grounded in reality, not just um generic AI slot. Now I think arguably this is one of the most important activities on the on page side is content optimization right so we always want to uh organic search is not a one once and done thing right like from a traditional perspective you might be ranking position one on Google today for a commercial query that you care about but what about next week what about in one month because your competitors are on the offense right they're actively trying to um out compete you know driving more links they're you know refreshing their content and There's a lot of SER vol uh volatility at the moment, right? That's also happening in AI search particularly with the demand of content. I would argue uh your finger needs to be on the pulse even more on the AEO side, right? So, we monitor the performance of content uh looking specifically for content decay, right? This content that was ranking well before and was a top-sighted source. Is it still there? Is it moving? Is it increasing? Right? just as we would be monitoring the SER um and this is a comment from someone actually I was speaking with LinkedIn where they um you know obviously might not be causation but they noticed that when they um didn't hit their content volume targets that it negatively impacted um their AO metrics right so I do think there's something there where just the honestly I think the the volume of content we need to put out just needs to be far greater and if you look at companies like um Shopify and ramp they're doing anywhere between five to 15 pieces of content per day, right? So I don't think volume itself is the issue. It's really just uh an operational challenge um to solve. Um so we do a lot of content refreshes, right? That might be optimizing existing content for LLM retrieval, running it through our citable framework, even adding small things like FAQs which can help you capture the longtail queries, you know, TLDDR sections so that as your content's getting passed it, making it easy for these systems to understand what the content is about um to decide if they want to go further as well as you know serverside render and stuff like that. Um we want to monitor and optimize for brand drift. This is um as I put here I think this will be one of the biggest challenges and I would kind of put this in the content refresh bucket. One of the biggest challenges with AI search is so mention rate, citation rate, share of voice are okay, but we actually want to drill down a bit further of like okay, well, how how is my company being perceived or represented in these LLMs, right? Like if you look at a SAS company surface error, you have platform, features, capabilities, differentiators, all of these kind of variables, which is a lot of information. Um, and so are all of those being captured um, in LLM? Like when somebody says, "Hey, how does competitor A, sorry, company A compare against company B?" What's the information that's being returned? Is the information recent, accurate, um, you know, detailed, or is the LLM still using your old pricing because there's a blog article from two years ago that has your old pricing, or it's saying you don't do thing A because, but you do thing A, it's just not communicated well on your website, right? I think this is going to be a huge concern because this information is going to influence buyer decisions, right? And so we want I want it's like a sales rep jumping on a call. I want that sales rep to be armed with the most up-to-date recent information so they are best positioned in our company competitively, right? Whereas if they're armed with a script that's 6 months old, well then your your close rates are going to go down, right? So this is a solution we're building perception module where we're we're scraping the answers, but then we're evaluating those answers. So we know what the source of truth is. you know what your position is today, what your pricing is, what features you have, your integrations, etc. What's the similarity between the answer that's coming back and this source of truth we have here, right? So, you can see here um basically some there was some hallucinated pricing in the AI response, right? And so then the action would become here, okay, what what's the root cause? Oh, it's this piece of content or a competitor did a comparison article and they have outdated information. Okay, we need to reach out and be like, hey, can you update this because you're lying. Um, so you measure that across funnel stages and the different components of a business. Um, and here's like a practical example we saw here or sorry, a real example where when we were doing this early on for a new client. Um, we noticed that it was saying basically, hey, if um if you have less than 10 employees, like don't use us effectively. And the reason why it was saying that is because it was pulling that information from a blog that was created in 2022, right? So like four years ago, reached out to the client. I was like, "Hey, is this still true?" And he's like, "No, like if you have less than 20 employees, yeah, work with us. We we have a free trial now." Right? So that was conflicting with their current positioning and could actively be losing them conversions because someone might see that and be like, "Oh, well, we have 10 employees. It's not a good fit." And then boom, decision made, right? So I think it's going to be a huge challenge for companies. So moving to the off- page side of things. Um, so building consistency across the web, right? So in SEO the game was to get back links to improve your domain authority which is page rank which is inferred by sort of you know leaks and also Google just telling us um themselves. I'm not saying my position is not backlinks are bad right we build links for clients that is not my position I'm not saying don't do backlinks but it's more now more about the natural and the often unlin conversations that are happening on the internet and what people are saying about your company. So, it's less about, hey, here's a link to this website. Go buy this website or like some commercial anchor text of like, you know, SEO agency, right? It's actually no like, well, Discover Labs is an AEO agency and this these are their differentiators. You know, this is what makes them different. We care more about that message than just the link um back to our website. Why it's not optimal? LM don't weight a link graph, right? So, they're not looking at your backlink profile. Um, and truthfully, page rank even plays less of a role in Google performance. Uh, this was said in around 2023. So just to add some nuance there like page rank even on the Google side is mattering less. Um so the new way to do this we want narrative consistency across independent sources right so we want to if we look at our surface here on the web golden outcome although probably an impossible outcome is that on all these sources we have um a consistent narrative being communicated whether that be the category term that we want to be associated with whether it be the amount of reviews we have whether it be the amount of case studies we have whether it be our differentiators relative to competitors we want that consistent message across the entire their website, right? Very, very hard to achieve. Um, we want that on Reddit, Kora, you know, insty publications, etc. The even the publishers that these LLMs are going to be scraping from to kind of update their training data. We want that baked into the models, right? And the reason being is because when buyers are asking these AI chats about you, about your category, we want to show up um in the best way possible, right? we want to be the recommended choice and that how that happens is all the information underneath that right our differentiators our positioning our pricing um etc and so this is actually something Ben my co-founder um published on LinkedIn last week where we're doing some research where basically the TLDDR here is that the majority um of influence in AI answers is off page right so we can see on chat dubity um heavily weights towards uh the most heavily out of other providers weights towards um like owned content 39%. But then that means you know there's a 61% um off- page sources that are influencing AI answers right and so we have found that there is some nuance here like from our experience uh this doesn't mean like just focus on off- page because a lot of companies just don't have um optimal content or optimal websites. So ideally, you know, you want to um do a lot of these in parallel, but um definitely what others are saying about you does influence uh these LLMs, right? And if you just think about it from like a, you know, an intuitive perspective is like if I'm evaluating an agency, right, and the agency founder is like, "Yeah, we're great. Like, you know, we'll get you results uh in this amount of time." But then you speak to your peers or someone who used to work for that agency and they're like, "Yeah, the you know uh false promises basically it didn't work out." You're going to trust that opinion far more than the agency, right? Exact same concept I think with these LLMs. Now what we um what's happening under the hood here is these LLMs are using an agree style framework. So as I think Ben put here, this is um a framework from Deep Mind. Uh so this is um I don't know if it's open source but there's definitely some research you can view online. We don't know truthfully this is the exact framework they're using. It's just a similar um style framework. So this is just basically a framework for how LLM's um ground claims um and site their sources accurately. Right? If we think about this from a first principal perspective when I ask chat GBT a question um it wants to give me an accurate answer. Right? The reason being is simple um user experience right? If chat GBT gives me an answer that is crap, it's hallucinated. It's inaccurate. It's rubbish. Well, then I'm probably no longer going to use chat GBT, right? Because why would I? The user experience is terrible. And so to create a good user experience, they don't they want to reduce hallucinations. To reduce hallucinations, they need to verify or ground their claims, right? So that's why off-page consistency is so important, particularly through the lens of B2B SAS, is because if you say you do this and this is how much you cost and this is why you're better. Well, then other sources need to be saying the exact same thing because if they conflict with that, then that's going to be um flagged by the model and they're going to be like, well, screw that. You know, I don't want to give a hallucinated answer back to the user. I'm just not going to recommend that company. Right? So those are the sort of stakes we're dealing with here. Um I think in the research it found that there was a 30% increase in citation accuracy through using uh the agree style framework. Now something somebody said to me the other day which I found funny is you know LLM are just Reddit rappers. Um which is kind of funny because they are heavily biased towards Reddit. Of course it's not you know they're not Reddit rappers but um for Chat Gutty specifically Reddit does heavily influence its retrieval pipeline right? And so we we bet on Reddit. um if you work with us we um we will build your presence on Reddit like on every in every package we have because um we think it would just give you such a big advantage from an AU perspective right and the data supports it so uh third party research um [clears throat] constantly tells us that Reddit is a top three-sided source this study itself actually um isn't great but in other studies um you know Reddit continues to be a top three sided source um under the hood uh chat GBT heavily relies on Reddit. So we actually did some research um which you can view on our website here where basically we didn't just look at the visible citations in the UI. We decrypted the TCP traffic of chatb to understand what's happening under the hood and we found that roughly 27% here we go 27% of its web searches um relied on Reddit. In other words, um, Chantivity is heavily influenced by what's happening on Reddit. And so the way we view it is if the LLM is heavily um, biased towards Reddit, then if we're shaping or influencing the category narrative on Reddit, then we are therefore influencing the AI answer that is given back to users. But then also, you know, most of these large LLMs were trained on Reddit data. as I showed you before, you know, um they were trained on forums like Reddit, but also publishers, you know, scraping content to train their models. And so there is this sort of innate connection between these LLMs and Reddit that I think would be hard to pull away because it's just such rich information there. But then uh just look at the money. There's large commercial agreements between OpenAI and Reddit and Reddit and Google. And so, you know, we we um we just think it's a worthy bet and we we think it's um it's it's going to be somewhere to focus for the long term. Don't just see this as like a flash in the pan. Um and if you look at uh so I think this is perplexity if I remember correctly, you can see that you know Reddit threads are being cited for commercial intent queries, right? Best cold email software. We can see that it's citing a Reddit thread here. Funny enough, the Reddit thread was deleted. This is interesting. And then you can see that somebody recommended sales handy and sales handy is the number one source uh in this response. Right? So Reddit heavily influences LLM responses. Therefore that's why um we focus on that. Now the TLDDR of our process is um we seed content in primary subreddits right so where have your ICP um or well not where your ICP is hanging out necessarily but where relevant content is going to be right. So if you're like a CRM software, then a lot of the relevant content is probably going to be in like sale the sales subreddit or like the SAS subreddit or the CRM subreddit or even competitors like HubSpot or Salesforce subreddits, right? So we seed content in those places. Um we do comments uh we do posts and we really have spent a lot of time thinking about how do we actually structure the content itself for a few reasons. Number one is we don't want to just post like AI slop that's generic and like you know clearly um lowquality content. Number two um it's really easy to get your content removed on Reddit. Um and so there are certain things you have to do to to prevent that. Now I'm not saying do anything black hat, but like ultimately this is an anonymous forum on the internet and so don't go on there speaking like you know uh you know using corporate lingo or speaking like you're on LinkedIn, right? there's a certain lingo um that happen uh that you need to use to to kind of fit in. But then third and most importantly is we want to capture the queries from the query fan out process, right? And so how that impacts our content is we're trying to include certain entities within that content. You know, competitor names, category terms, uh integrations, use cases, etc. because we want to create brand association between you as an entity and all those other entities. So LLMs um you know develop that connection and therefore know in what situation um they can recommend you best to users. Right here are just some examples of content is blurred because we don't want to sort of reveal confidential information for clients. If you want to see more examples um just uh ping me and I'll share them. So um how do we know where to target? Right. So we primarily build our target list through our analytic analytics engine that we've built. you can just use thirdparty software um because depending on the objective if the objective is um influencing AI answers so that you become a recommended solution then well then we should inform our target list by what's happening in AI answers not necessarily what is ranking on Google SER so that's why we use this um this allows us to view the actual Reddit threads that are being cited in these AI answers so here we can see there 135 citations um and this gives us an exact list These are the conversations when we're searching these uh these prompts in your category. These are the conversations that are shaping those prompts. And so therefore, we want to influence the narrative in those conversations. So here we can see for a client um three out of four of the top Reddit threads for their target query in this subreddit they care about um were threads created by us. So you know, yes, we want to influence um AI answers, but also ultimately we're doing organic search here, right? So when people are natively searching queries on Reddit, we also want them to come across our content as well. So we're trying to hit it from all these different angles. And by the way, we do have like a free tool on our website. Just go to Reddit Threadsfinder. Um you just I think you just put in your domain. Um we'll go to it here actually. You just put in your domain and yeah, just put in your company domain and what we'll return is we'll basically go out and we'll search across the main LLMs and we'll pull the threads that actually being cited in your category. so that you can do this yourself. You can target these threads. Um, you know, post content, uh, get your company baked into into the AI answers. So, key takeaways for this video. Um, so ultimately there is a large overlap between SEO and AO, but we believe there's enough surface area that's worth optimizing for if you want to gain an edge. Keeping content, both owned and earned updated and consistent will likely be the biggest challenge. It's just logistically intense. It's really tough to do. And so if you can solve that then you're going to have an advantage. We believe Reddit is a worthy bet due to its influence on LLMs and we see that being a thing for uh over the long term. And finally, a new measurement methodology is required due to zeroclick research and the non-deterministic behavior of LLMs. So that's the end of this one. Hope you enjoyed. Any questions? If you think I should post a topic uh um that you're interested in, then just let me know. Just

---

Eric Siu (Single Grain)

If you're just learning SEO, you picked the perfect time because the game has changed more this year than it has in the past 10 years. And that's to your advantage. People are finding answers on chat GBT, Reddit, and YouTube rather than just Google. Google is rewriting search with AI overviews, and new tools now exist that can do 80% of the work without you. This is your no fluffs beginner's guide to what actually works. this year. SEO used to be about optimizing for Google. 15 years ago, the only organic game in town was very much Google. There was no YouTube. There was no Instagram. All of these platforms either didn't exist or they were very nent. Nowadays, you have to think about optimizing for YouTube. That's the second largest search engine in the world. You have to think about Amazon if you are optimizing for shoppers. If you're optimizing for different communities, you're optimizing for Reddit. The main thing to think about is that if you're only focusing on Google, you are missing out. Now, although SEO is changing rapidly, it still has three essential building blocks that still hold true today. These have been the building blocks for a long time, but it's how you use them across different platforms like Google, YouTube, and Amazon that makes the difference today. So, let's start with how you can use content to rank on any platform. Winning this year when it comes to SEO means targeting longtail niche queries with real intent. I'm going to give you a couple examples of that. Instead of optimizing for let's say Salesforce as a keyword, you might be thinking about optimizing for keywords such as how to integrate Netswuite with Salesforce or instead of red shoes, you might be optimizing for what are the best red shoes designs for this year. And so anything that has let's say four plus keywords in it. These are longer tail niche queries that have real intent. And when people are searching for these keywords, they are often lower competition and lower volume, but they have higher intent, which means that the conversion rates for these keywords, the ability to convert these into customers or convert them into email subscribers is a lot higher. What that means is because search is getting a lot more competitive nowadays, what's happening is because of AI overviews, the impressions for websites, that's actually going up, but the number of clicks is going down. And I actually just spoke to a CEO of an enterprise SEO company earlier this week and he said they have a lot of data where it shows that your graph now when you look at your analytics. It looks like a jaw. Your impressions are going up but your clicks are going down. So you have to optimize for wherever you can find high intent, you're going to have a much easier time of optimizing for those because the game of website traffic is continuing to change. So how do you go about doing that? What you can actually do is use products out there like chat GPT or Manis AI and these can help you find these longtail keywords and you can just give a couple examples of high intent longtail keywords that you want to optimize for and then talk a little bit about your business and then what will happen is it'll spit out 50 or 100 of these and then you can pick the ones that you like and then you can focus on creating the content for these longtail highintent keywords. Okay, so we briefly touched upon large language models such as chat GPD, which help you generate keyword ideas, analyze transcripts, and refine your SEO strategy quickly. What you can do is yes, you can create those high intent longtail keywords, but it can actually even create blog posts based on whatever your writer guidelines are. And what I mean by that is your writer guidelines are your way, your style of creating content. You can actually have LLM now scan your blog content on your site and it will figure out what the writer guidelines are. So, for example, typically our blog posts are around 1,500 to 2,000 words. And they're backed with a lot of links, a lot of statistics, a lot of tables. And an LLM was able to figure that out. And after it figured it out, it was able to create high quality blog posts, extremely high quality blog post, basically 95 to 99% there. And was able to do 21 of these in a span of 30 minutes. So, you have a lot more power in your hands now as an SEO because you have an AI assistant that is infinitely patient that will help you figure out what you should be doing next with your strategy and then help you execute on that strategy. All right, so we touched upon some of the more advanced things, but I do need to talk about some of the basics here. We talked about citations. The currency when it comes to SEO, it's still content and links even this year. And so content and links, what does that mean? That means you have to create very high quality content and you have to have other sites linking to you to prove that your site deserves to rank in the search engines. So citations can mean links. Citations can mean from a local SEO standpoint, it can be the people that are giving you reviews. There's a lot of different citations across the internet. So we talked about content citations and double eat. What that means is experience, expertise, authoritiveness, and trustworthiness. And because there's so many people creating content on the internet now, this is going to continue to be more important. And so me creating this YouTube right now, it does show me sharing experiences. So stories, for example, there's the expertise, there's authoritiveness, and there's a trustworthiness. Can you trust this person? Right? Even if we're talking about expanding beyond organic SEO, that's still going to carry over into other algorithms cuz it just makes sense at the end of the day. So again, double eat, you have citations, and you have content, and that's still very much going to play, but that's going to evolve over time. So those building blocks, keep those in mind because whatever game you decide to play when it comes to search everywhere optimization, these will always be should always be in the back of your mind. All right, so now that I gave you the building blocks, I want to go more into the new toolkit. These are tools that can do 80% of the work. And these are new tools that can automate SEO tasks such as internal linking, content pruding, making SEO more efficient than ever. And so some examples of this, you can definitely use an autonomous agent like Manis.ai or you can use something like Genspark.ai. When it comes to internal linking, you can have it scan your entire website or scan sections of your website and help it figure out where you should be adding internal links for keywords that you want to be ranking for. You can say, "My website stands for this. It's a digital marketing agency. I want to make sure that these keywords are prioritized and we're adding more internal links for them." Or you can go out there and you can build products yourself. You can vibe code internal linking tools using Replet or using cursor. Internally for us, we built a product called ClickFlow. These are products that we use for our clients and that helps us create internal links that helps us figure out what content we should be pruning, we should be consolidating or content that we should be deleting. But the main thing now is that you have a lot more power in your hands even as a non-technical person. You can actually deploy these little tools, these little apps that you can use and you're going to be able to do your work a lot more efficiently. And so when we talk to our team about using these different products, they're saying they can do 70 to 80% of their work a lot faster. They're saving a lot more hours and they're spending their time on higher leverage work. A lot of what we covered so far used to take weeks or days even. This is where you're lucky if you're a beginner now because there are so many tools out there that automate the heavy lifting. Now, I want to talk quickly about surviving the future because AI overviews are completely disrupting organic search. In fact, Google's AI overviews are reducing organic traffic studies show by drops of more than 37%. So, just to give you a little more context on AI overviews, these are the answers that Google offers at the top of the page to reply to search queries. And so what that means for your strategy is that you've got to shift rapidly because the game now, as I mentioned, is the search everywhere optimization future. Most AI writing tools were built by engineers who have never written a blog post in their lives. Clickflow is entirely different. It's built by my team of SEO marketers and learns your business inside out, delivering automated, scalable content that is optimized for search engines and reads like it was crafted by your own team. No more managing freelancers, no more babysitting briefs. Just press go and grow. So head to clickflow.com and get your first 25,000 words free. That's not a typo. 25,000. Go get them. clickflow.com. So website traffic is going to continue to decline over the next 5 10 years or so. And like I mentioned earlier, you think about looking at your Google Search Console. You definitely should still have Google Search Console today, but when you log into it, you're going to see that in the purple, usually it's in the purple, that your website traffic impressions are in fact going up and your clicks are going down. So that's going to decline over time, but that doesn't mean you should completely give up on organic search because I look at it as a cigar butt type of business. And so Warren Buffett likes to say that there are businesses that are dying, but it's going to take time to decline over time. And so over the next 5 to 10 years, you can still take advantage while everyone runs for the exits, you can still be in there taking advantage while you're covering other areas around search everywhere optimization. So websites still matter and you need to optimize for where your audience actually hangs out online. So I just want to reemphasize this that traditional SEO is not dying. It's simply spreading out. What that means is going back to optimizing for multiple channels now because attention is so fragmented. It is the search everywhere optimization experience. And the problem that traditional SEOs have had in the past is they are one trick ponies. They only focus on one basket. You cannot play the game that way today because the marketing game has changed. And so the best way to do this is by learning by doing. That means for example getting better at YouTube. That means if you're going to start a podcast, start a podcast and then you can figure out how to publish it to short form. Within short form, let's say Tik Tok for example, people are searching for things. On Instagram reels, people are searching for things. On LinkedIn, people are searching for things. Humans are always going to search for things because humans are infinitely curious. And the mediums always change over time, but the messaging doesn't change. You just have to adapt to the meta, the most optimized way of playing for each channel. And you have to experiment, you got to make mistakes, and you have to keep building. So, with the right AI tools and the right strategies, SEO is actually easier than ever and you'll improve much faster than you think. If you enjoyed this video, I want you to watch this next one over here on how Manis AI just completely changed the SEO game to learn more about how to scale up your SEO efforts even more. [Music]

---

Nathan Gotch (Gotch SEO)

I'm going to show you 10 proven ways to use chat GBT for SEO without spamming or doing anything risky. And these techniques will save you a massive amount of time and effort in your SEO campaigns. My name is Nathan Gotch and I've led hundreds of successful SEO campaigns over the last decade and I'm the CEO of Rankability, a top AI SEO software company. And let's start with number one, which is filter through a huge list of keywords based on relevance. So start by going into a keyword research tool. So in this case, I'm just going to use Rankability and go ahead and download the keyword list that you're trying to filter through. So in this case, I'll just copy them and then we're going to go over to Chat GBT. And what I'm going to do is use this very simple prompt. And I'll have all these prompts below the video. But for now, just let me walk you through this real quickly. So essentially what we're trying to do is we're trying to take this huge list of let's say 400 keywords and narrow it down into the most relevant keywords to pursue. And this is kind of just stage one of filtering through keywords, but it's the most important because we want to see how close is this keyword to actually making us money in this business. Okay? And the shorter that gap is, the better it's going to be. The more the longer that gap is, the further away someone is to actually making a buying decision, the worse that keyword is going to be and the lower priority that it should be. So in this case, you can see here you're going to see what the company sales sells. So in this case is bankruptcy lawyer in Atlanta. And then we're going to go ahead and just paste in those keywords. Okay, so it thought for about 2 minutes and 40 seconds and you can see it took that huge list of keywords and assigned that relevant score. Chat GBT SEO technique number two is to group your keywords by clusters. So now you have your keyword relevance. Now, what you want to do is take all these keywords and only look at the keywords that have good relevance and then put them into into buckets and clusters because basically when you do SEO, you really want to focus on one cluster at a time. You don't want to just be spreading yourself across a bunch of different irrelevant topics. You want to focus in on one cluster, go a mile deep on that cluster, and then move on to the next one. This is how you're going to build really good performance. So, you can see here what I said is just create categories clusters for this keyword set. And then basically what we're doing is having it put it into a table. So now you can see it's going to go ahead and build this for us and it's going to put it all into the appropriate categories and clusters. Putting each of these topics into the right buckets. And then we're going to attack that bucket with all of our focus and all of our effort. When we finish one bucket, we're going to move on to the next bucket. And then these will all these clusters will all link to each other. And this is how you build real topic authority on your website. And then what you want to do is after you've attacked all these topics on your website, then you want to take these same exact topics and attack them on YouTube and LinkedIn and every other place you're creating content. And now for chat GBT SEO technique number three, which is to create new content that ranks. So the first thing you want to do is go into chat GBT. And what you're going to have ChatGBT do is a couple things. Number one, and this is under the assumption that we're creating a commercial page on the local level, but this would apply to any commercial page in any industry. Okay? So this case, we're going to do HBAC. And what we're going to do is we're going to have it crawl a specific website here. So this is going to be the website that we're going to be creating a commercial page on. And you can see crawl this HBAC business. You put in the root domain like this. And then extract their unique selling propositions testimonials and turn it into a prompt for Rankabil's AI writer context window. And then you put the primary keyword in there and then say what what the intent of the of the page is. Okay? So in this case going to be commercial intent. Now, here's the most important part. Make sure that you use the thinking model in chat GBT. Okay? So, you can see here I have selected the thinking model and I didn't do extended thinking. I just did the standard thinking for this one. That's all you really need. And the reason this is really critical because if you don't do this, it's it may not be as accurate. So, what you'll see here, if you click on thought for 20 seconds, you can see that it actually went and crawled this website. And this is really critical. we need to have it go and retrieve this information. So, what we're doing here is instead of just creating generic AI content, what we're doing is we're we're adding context that makes this content really unique to this business. Okay? And that's really important when you're building commercial page. It should be relevant to your business because you're trying to persuade someone to become a lead or a customer. Okay? So, that is the idea. So, we want to have that context. You don't just want to create generic content. We're going to go in here. We're going to create a new piece of content. We're going to go ahead and click uh use AI generated content. Go ahead and run this through. This will be a service page. And then we go ahead and grab uh go ahead and grab this critical information about this business. Okay. So, we're going to go ahead and copy this and we're going to put this into the context window. All right. So, the article is ready. We'll go ahead and just click through and we should see that it is already optimized and ready for the editorial process. Jack GBT SEO method number four is to optimize existing content. So the easiest way to optimize existing pages is to simply just go into the content optimizer to import URL content inside of Rankability, enter the keyword phrase, and then enter the URL that you want to optimize or improve and then just run that optimizer. Okay, so now the report is done. So we'll go ahead and just click through and we're going to be able to immediately see the gaps that this page has. And that's really what we want to see is like, you know, before I showed you a page that's optimized very well that we built from scratch. We want to get to this point with any existing page that we have. So we can see here we've got tons of opportunities to attack some of these topics and ultimately make this page more relevant. Now, funny enough, this page is, you know, 1,800 words, but it's just not relevant, right? So the words don't make the page perform well. The relevance makes the page perform well in search. Okay, that's what matters. So, let's go ahead and grab this content and we're actually going to take this content and we're going to copy it over and we're going to put it into chat GBT. Okay, so we're going to revise this copy and we're going to put this in here like this and then we'll also say and cover all the critical related topics. Okay, so we're going to go back in here. We can actually just sort this by relevance. We're going to copy this and then we'll go ahead and just paste this into chat GPT. Okay, so as you can see, this took about 10 seconds for chat GPT to do this. So, we copy this and now we're going to go ahead and see if it made a big improvement. So, we're at about a 21, the original asset. We're going to go over here. We're going to paste in this version. And it got to a 36. Okay, so didn't quite cover all the topics that it needed to. So, that means all we have to do now is we're going to go back over here and go to unused. Okay, and we're just going to copy these. And when you copy these over, it's only going to copy over the unused keywords. We're going to go back to check GPT and we're going to say revise to make sure you cover all of these critical topics. We actually don't have to say all. We can say cover most of these critical topics. Okay, we'll give it some freedom to choose what it should cover. Okay, so it took about 12 seconds to revise that copy. So, let's see how much better this performs now uh as far as relevance. So, we got it up to a 36 originally. uh as in our first draft. We'll see how the second draft of this performs and we got up to a 60. Okay. So, now we're really in a spot where, you know, you could theoretically do another run and like you try to go to the next level with this, but honestly, you you probably could be fine with just at a 60, right? I mean, I do typically recommend at least hitting the optimal, but in this scenario, we basically took it from I think about a 20 something up to a 60. That means we've we've uh more than doubled actually we've tripled the relevance of this page. Okay. So I would think in this case this would be uh enough relevance to launch and see how it performs and if it still needs a little bit more then you can take it to you know another level. So right here I'd be pretty satisfied with this. And then now I just focus on making sure that this page is very high quality. It's designed well. It's got that nice commercial structure so it can actually drive conversions. and then it should be good to go. And now for number five, which is to create schema markup. So at this point, it's no secret that chat GBT can create schema markup for you. Now the initial schema that you get is usually got some it's pretty templated. It it needs some work. Okay, so you'll see here as I go through this process iterating on this schema. So what I did here is I said add all reviews from G2 and Capterara. So you can see here over in the activity, it actually went through and crawled all of these reviews. Okay, crawled them all and then updated this schema and now it's got really, you know, very rich schema that we can add to the page itself. So, I just go into replet and then I'm just going to paste this in. Replet will go update this review page schema. Okay, so finish this schema markup and we can see here we'll go ahead and refresh this and we'll see if we go to the builder, we'll see that it I had to adjust it to the product schema, but you can see here it's got all the schema markup in here and it's good to go. So, this just makes this page more rich specifically for traditional search engines. There's not a whole lot of evidence that AI platforms use this as of right now, but we do know that traditional search engines do likely use schema markup. Moving on to number six, which is to create datadriven content. Number one, make sure you pick the right model. So, for this one, I did the thinking model and I did extended thinking for this. Okay? So, the most extreme thinking you can use other than the research grade one. Okay? So what you can see here is I just said research this topic and share your findings. Okay, that's how you want to start with this. Now you can see you know yes you could do this yourself. You could manually research this topic. But the advantage here is that when we click on the reasoning process you can see what it goes through and ultimately how many sources it digs through. So it's essentially doing what we used to do by opening up you know a 100 tabs and filtering through the information trying to find the answer. Uh it's doing it in 2 minutes. Okay. Or give or take two or three minutes. Uh so analyzing uh all of these sources, hundreds of sources in about three minutes and synthesizing that information for you. I mean it's pretty crazy. So what we can see here though is all right, we've got the we've got the information. Now what we can do is we can actually take this information and and convert it into an article. But this is where we take it to the next level. Okay. So instead of just taking this and just like you know creating an article like this directly from this you layer on rankability as well. So that way you've got this unique curated data also with the really good relevance. So you can see what I did here is I go ahead and just copy over. So I did is dwell time a Google ranking factor. Copy over these topics and then we're going to go back in here and you'll see I'm going to say write an article explaining your findings. Mention the source and make sure you cover these critical topics. Okay. So, it's going to cover these topics. Um, and notice I don't give it a word count target. I don't usually give it word count targets anymore. I just let it go where it wants to go cuz I give it the topics to run with and then let the AI determine how much depth you should go into each kind of area. Okay? And sometimes you obviously have to make adjustments, but at least initially, let it just do its thing. Okay? And you can see here already it built out an asset pretty quickly. Okay? But it's it's missing a title. It's it needs a little bit of work. So, I had to do a quick revision. Um, you can see here now we've got the actual title in here. So, we'll go and just paste this title into rankability and now we've got uh, you know, we're already rank we've got the most important topic already in here. So, obviously the score goes up a lot cuz having it in the title, we've personally we've made it that way so that you get more points if it's in the actual title cuz it's really critical. Okay, so short answer you can see here. So we'll go and paste this over just copy this uh what it built and we'll see how this draft did uh and we'll take a look. So uh on the first try already highly highly relevant and so for us from here basically all we would do is we take this content and then we would turn it into something uh you know much more digestible and readable. Uh show images obviously have all of our citations. Um, and then we've already basically done all the heavy lifting of this work. And now for number seven, which is to generate linkbait ideas. So I'll have this prompt below the video, but basically what you can do is I created a little syntax. Uh, I built this uh quite some time ago. And basically what it's going to do is you could take this little syntax and just update this section here, which is the type of business that you're trying to create link bait for, and then the location if if it's local, assuming it's local. And then you're going to run this through. And once again, use the thinking model cuz it tends to be a little bit better. And then we can go and look at all the different types of link bait that it's going to build. The reason why we're using this syntax here is because these are all ideas that are proven to be linkable. Okay, very proven linkability either based on emotion or based on a particular content framework. So, this is just a really quick way to just get tons of good ideas that then you can run with and then you can keep expanding on these ideas, right? you look at some of these and just go deeper and deeper into these ideas. Moving on to number eight, which is to create free tools. And what I did is I forced chat GBT to go and research the proper structure and guide guidelines for this specific standard. And then I actually having it build the tool itself. So you can see here in about 1 minute and 22 sec or 1 minute and 26 seconds. Man, it's a sometimes it blows my mind how quickly it does stuff like this. But you can see here, you know, it it built out the HTML. Uh, it even built out the CSS and the JavaScript, everything. It's good to go completely. So, all I have to do is go over here and look at preview. And you can see, uh, it's already built this little basic tool. Okay? Like, no problem at all. So, and this is like a minute and 20, you know, a minute of work. So, obviously, you're going to work with this, improve it, test it, make sure it works, and then and then deploy it on the website. But once again, just showing how quickly we can create linkbait is is just it's never been this easy. And now for chat GBT SEO technique number nine, which is turning it into your full-time link builder. So I've showed already many times on my channel how you can use agents to go and do link prospecting for you. And so at this point, once again, there's just no good reason for you to be going into Google and just opening up a bunch of link prospects when the agent can do this for you. And in fact, the agent right now, I've got a little post-it note here. um the agent on the pro mode, you can do up to 40 agent requests a month. 40 requests. So that means you could do 40 prospecting campaigns every single month. So think about you could basically tap out an entire industry in one month if you maximize all of your credits with the agent mode inside of chat GBT. So maximize this stuff. What I did here is I'll have this problem below the video, but basically I'm looking for listicles, but this is gives you the nice list of prospects to work with. And you can actually have the agent go and find the emails or contact information as well. And moving on to number 10, which is to track your chat GBT SEO performance. So, I actually have a brand new training dedicated to AI search analytics and tracking. But just real quick, I'll give you a real quick kind of 101 tutorial here, which is go and create this use this very simple prompt to create 10 synthetic prompts and use a seed like I'm using. So, plumber in Chesterfield, Missouri. And then what you'll do is have ChatGBT create these synthetic prompts for you. Okay? So, then just grab one of these prompts and then what you want to do next is go and create a dedicated testing account inside of ChatGBT. So, we have a dedicated email that we use for the testing. go in here and then you can see we're going to put this prompt in and this is uh you know this is actually spelled wrong but the top 10 best plumbers in Chesterfield, Missouri uh for emergency leaks right now. So it's important to mention right now because it's going to force chat GBT to use retrieval and we need it to use retrieval to get the most current information. So by saying right now or 2025 or you know you get really specific but you want to force it to use retrieval and then from here what you're doing is seeing is our brand actually appearing in this generated response. So it's a it's a it's a binary kind of question. It's a one or a zero. So one yes zero no. Okay that's the first part. Then the second part is what position are we in? So if we are here where are we showing up on this list? And this is similar to, you know, what we're used to with SEO, which is like the top ranking results get all, you know, get all the visibility. So, you want to be recommended higher on this list because, uh, you know, most people are not going to remember you if you're somewhere in the middle, even at the end. Okay? So, there's ways to push this up more, but the point is just to establish benchmarks. Those two things are the most important. Like, number one, are we mentioned? Number two, what's our position? Then what you want to do is you want to use all of those synthetic prompts and you want to run these across uh run all of these that all have different intent and then get a kind of a cumulative idea of your overall brand visibility across chat GPT. Okay, that's what you want to do. You need to have a lot of coverage. If you just do one, that's not going to give you a lot of information. You want to see ultimately how visible you are across all of these prompts and then ultimately what your position is across all these prompts. And that will give you a really nice idea. uh and ultimately a good place to begin working from to improve your visibility. So that's just a taste of what's possible. If you want more chat GBT SEO systems, apply for Rankability Academy and watch the next video to learn how to get ChatGBT to recommend your business or your client's business.

---

Jen Cornwell

My name is Jen Cornwell. I'm Senior Director of AI SEO at Tinuiti. I've been in the SEO space for about 10 years. I joined Tinuiti more recently, and I'm gonna walk us through what the last year has really looked like. I'm gonna catch us up to speed with what's been going on, um, since Simon took the stage last year to talk about AI search, uh, what we've been talking about, and what that looks like for orchestration for your brand. Um, so how do you take some of these insights back to what conversations could look like for what matters? So what do we know? 2025, I think, was the year of like, "Oh, wow, look at this cool, new, shiny thing," but then also, "Oh my God, look at this cool, new, shiny thing," and it's very disruptive. So how do we start to understand what that shift looks like? Uh, 2026 has been much more about, okay, we have some bearings. We have some understanding of what's going on. We're in the middle of the platform wars, but we know a little bit more. So what do those conversations need to start to look like in order for us to achieve search visibility, um, and then just better overall brand, which we'll talk about too. So- All of these things we have found truly matter for AI search in one way or another. The biggest takeaway, I'm gonna say this more than one time, biggest takeaway for this talk is that AI search visibility is not achievable with just your SEO team. SEO needs a much larger seat at the table. SEO needs to be talking to all of these groups so we can align on what is the messaging that we wanna provide and how can we actually collaborate to come up with a strategy that's going to show up, turn into AI search visibility ultimately. So that is what we'll walk through. So this was Simon, and I'm gonna take us through just the preview. If you missed it, Simon was on stage. Uh, he made this joke, I wasn't going to, but I will now, as a magician, um, that was a big part of his talk in his vest. Magician Si- Simon got on stage and talked a lot about this, what has ultimately changed from traditional search journey to what we're looking at now. And I think the biggest things here that we'll talk about, conversational exploration, consumer behavior has changed. The way people search and explore has changed. We also know, um, just what that looks like in general. Searchers have reset expectations, so they're not looking for how do I anymore. They're looking for which is, what is. Um, we see some no intent types, search intent behavior, uh, where, uh, no intent is gonna be those people that are like, "Hello, I'm having a bad day." Right? That is happening. That was never happening in Google before. The other big piece of this is generative. So my really quick antidote- anecdote for you on generative, my mom is remodeling her kitchen and her living room. She is going into ChatGPT, and she's like, "Hey, I'm picking out paint colors. I need to find cupboards that match. Uh, I need specs for my fireplace." Those are generative, generative conversations where she is project managing, list building, introduced to new products and brands in that way. So I think that if we're talking about like behavior and we're moving away from kind of like the shiny object that AI is, that is one of the biggest shifts that brands have to start to consider. How do you show up in those conversations? I like this slide. This is great because this is what consumer journey looks like now. There are so many touch points, um, and AI search is additive. I think that is a big thing too. People think that, okay, nobody's using traditional search anymore. AI search is actually driving more sessions inside of like a traditional Google. This is top of funnel, mid-funnel research, at least at this point, that people are doing. We're moving closer to agentic commerce, where people will actually be transacting inside of platforms, but ultimately, they're researching, um, somewhere in this journey, and then they're coming back to typically a traditional search in your D2C website or, or wherever they end up purchasing from. I also really like this. So this came from SparkToro. I think we go into-- I've done this before, right? We go into conversations. Oh, Google has all of the search. All of the search happens on Google. It does not. Search happens everywhere. Search is a behavior and not a channel. So, uh, a couple that I like to call out, Amazon, if you're a brand and you're not thinking about how you organically show up in Amazon. We'll also talk about how Amazon influences some of what happens inside of LLMs. YouTube is another big one, obviously being on the main stage, but I've been working with Brian a lot, thinking about what full funnel looks like. Um, ChatGPT is a really small percentage here that's obviously growing. Um, but just thinking about where does this line up with where your audience is. Because yes, this is everywhere people are. Where is your audience inside of this map? So you can actually think about what search behavior looks like for your consumer, um, because this, it's not all in Google, and SEO isn't just search engines So the last year, I've been at Tinuiti for a year on the innovation and growth team, which is really cool. I've gotten to talk to lots of smart people. All of this is a result of internal orchestration. So when I was putting this presentation together, I was like, "Oh, you know, I've had all these interesting conversations. Are these things that brands are doing too?" Because when I go and speak with brands, a lot of the time they're very overwhelmed. There's so many things that you could do for AI search. So how do you start to facilitate something that is more of maybe a change management approach? What does that internal culture look like where you can actually show up cross-channel? And what do those conversations need to start to look like? So the first one was with Michelle, who's here, so I call her out. Um, holistic search has always been a thing. How do your paid channels and your SEO channel work together? How does SEM and SEO meet in the middle to figure out what, uh, tackling SERP real estate looks like? So me, Michelle, and Simon got together. Google announced ads in AI mode, and we said, "Okay, what do we need to start to think about? What do we need to do to figure out those strategies for clients?" So this is what SERP looks like now, right? I think the biggest thing here is that organic content shapes paid performance inside of AI surfaces. SERP real estate, the anatomy of SERP has changed so drastically. It is driven so much by intent. If you're thinking about how your brand shows up inside of all of the features, including AI search, that is how we need to start to think about holistic SERP journey. AI, uh, when they're serving ads in the Google documentation that came out for AI overviews and AI mode in particular, that conversation that happens organically is what's starting to drive that ad visibility. We met with Criteo a few weeks ago. They're rolling out their, um, uh, OpenAI ad product. It was really interesting. The-- There's, like, no keyword signals. It's just the URL. You send the URL, and then OpenAI decides when to serve your ad, and it's based on the content that's on the page. Content is typically owned, at least at this point, right? These are, like, very basic ad models. They're, like, trying to figure out what they're doing. Um, but content is something that's owned by SEO. So how do you start to collaborate landing page strategies? What do those look like? How do you think about it from a CRO perspective, but then also what value it adds organically? How do you better answer questions? We have the traditional side, the stuff hopefully you're already doing. How do you maximize paid and organic visibility? The conversational search analysis is one of the really interesting new spaces to be in. Um, intent, again, how are you thinking about intent across both? Um, how are you thinking about what that conversation is and where you meet them in the middle? And then sentiment. Um, sentiment is a new factor for brands. When someone asks, since like the, you know, the branded search term, ultimately, when someone asks an LLM, "Tell me about brand plus cost, reviews, et cetera," what does it say back? You know, I've talked to a lot of brands about this. Have you searched your brand in an LLM and seen what it says? Um, so how do you take some of that nuance and use it in your copy messaging? This is true for paid search, but we're also, um, our creative team's always really interested in sentiment. I'm sharing it with them. I'm sharing it with the strategy team. I'm sharing it with so many people actually at Tinuiti beyond just paid search Okay. I'm gonna shift us over to citations. Citations are new. Uh, we have partnered with Profound. Um, so I was digging through Profound data, and I said, "Oh my God, YouTube's up here, and then Facebook's up over here, and there's, like, so many things changing." So I went to Andy Taylor, our head of v- research, and Andy and I set a meeting, and we said, "Okay, how are we gonna, like, start to analyze this?" And the Q1 Citation Trend Report was born. Um, so, uh, this was the other thing I was really annoyed about, was reading all these headlines. Like Reddit YouTube. I also like this one where Google is citing Google. So if you're a brand, that's… Which is true, by the way, Google cites themselves. Um, if you're a brand and you're trying to navigate what really matters, if you're just going based off the headlines, you don't really understand. I also was annoyed by this because it's not the same for every category. What matters for apparel is very different than what matters for beauty than what matters for electronics. We see YouTube with a much larger influence in apparel beauty versus, like, B2B home services. So if you're just going based off of this, you're not really understanding what's happening within what I'm calling your, your topic ecosystem. What do the LLMs look at? What do they care about? What do they think the user cares about to be able to put together those answers? Not gonna run through all of this. This is a pretty dense slide. I will say, we have the Q2 version of the Citation Trends Report coming out soon. That got sent to me this week. Um, the biggest thing I think I wanna call out from this is the change in tracked AI overview citations. There's just been so many shifts with how these business models are trying to figure out how to best serve the user. So when you start to chase the shiny object of, like, okay, it's citations inside of here, or it's Reddit or whatever it is, the flavor of the week, um, I think you're at the mercy of the platforms a little bit. So really the strategy is instead of chasing tactic, it's starting to build brand. How do you think about what holistic brand looks like? So let me get into PDPs. Fun fact about this slide, it said Rufus on it 24 hours ago. If you didn't hear, Rufus is deprecated, is what they said, but they have rolled it into Alexa for shopping. So, um, that's, again, my segue into being, being in the middle of the platform wars. This is also, like, every… Like, Google and everyone else has done this, where they, like, roll out some AI product, and then they're like, "Oh, actually we should have called it something else." Yeah. Exactly. But Joe O'Connor, who's on our commerce team, came to me and said, "What do we know about Rufus, and does it work the same way as LLMs?" So this, I think, is one of the interesting things we did. We did a test. Um, it started with us just all looking for dog food on ChatGPT and then all looking for dog food on Amazon. ChatGPT results were, like, pretty similar, like 80 to 90% of the same results. Amazon was, like, totally different, right? Because it has so much of my purchase history. So I think this is really important to, to know because we talk a lot about LLMs and personalization. This ChatGPT profile of me is, like, very aspirational. It makes me sound really, really, really great. Um, Alexa, one thing it got wrong, it thinks I'm a parent. I have no kids. Uh, but I buy a lot of kids books on Amazon, so it just assumed I was a parent. Uh, and I think that's just important context, right? For how all of these different models operate. The answers I get out of ChatGPT is probably gonna be different than Gemini, too. But Amazon ultimately is really heavily based on what that shopping, um, profile looks like. So we also pulled some Amazon data into our citation trends report. Where you see nothing at the bottom, so our ChatGPT, Gemini, Perplexity, Amazon is not being cited there because it's actually blocked on those platforms. So I think that's important context too. It doesn't mean it never shows up. There's like a query fan-out process we won't get into. It's a little more technical. Um, but, but what is showing up there instead, and it's actually Walmart inside of ChatGPT, which was really interesting. Walmart people in the back. Yeah. Nice. Nice. Nice. I think that stayed consistent in the Q2 report too, so like TBD. But, um, but yeah, I think in general, right, how do we start to think about what product visibility looks like across all surfaces? If the LLMs are relying on, yes, your D2C website, but then they're also verifying across Amazon and Walmart and where your products are listed, how are you unifying that strategy for product visibility? So, uh, we've been working actually with, with our commerce team on one of our clients on organic Amazon optimization. Um, it's been really interesting. It's actually been a really fun collaboration with that team to start to like figure out how we speak each other's languages and, and what really matters, and what are the principles that we apply to SEO that also apply to Amazon and vice versa. So these are some things we're thinking about, semantic optimization. Um, how do you align with lifestyle inside of your optimization search? Um, sponsor prompt reports. I think that probably still comes from Alexa. It did come from Rufus, so you can get an idea of what prompts are showing up in Amazon, and then, um, just asking Alexa Shopping what matters in your category. So I don't love the advice of like, "Ask Claude how to do your SEO strategy." That's bad. But you can ask, like, what do you think this user cares about? Because what we found in a lot of our analysis is true for all of the LLMs. They have some idea of what the user is trying to get to. So when we look at things like semantic themes across a category, stuff like price that always shows up or, um, what that in-store experience looks like, there's a lot of consistency in the themes that the LLM wants to pull up because it thinks the user needs it to make a decision. Cool. YouTube, I did not know-- Well, I guess I knew Brian was gonna be on stage, but this is also what Brian asked me, right? How do we start to think about full funnel? So how do we get more value out of YouTube, uh, in the organic side? YouTube, again, more citation trend data. This was really, um, impactful. I also have Reddit in here. I won't not talk about Reddit, but YouTube has so much more value. You saw all the stuff Brian presented, so much more ROI, so many other ways to map and measure. Reddit, text posts and comments, it's not a bad strategy. It's not a thing that I'm saying you shouldn't necessarily do. I do think it's a harder place for brands to play, but we know it has a huge influence specifically on Google products up at the top. Uh, Google has access to the transcripts for YouTube videos. ChatGPT does not. They only have titles and descriptions, so they can actually ingest that. Um, the other piece is, uh, what, um, what videos show up. Does not always need to be brand-owned content. It is sometimes just other people talking about your brands, whether it's affiliate or influencer, so I think that's something to consider too. We also see the footprint growth for organic for YouTube. So this is YouTube inclusion inside of AI overviews. It's grown 10X in the last year, so just the number of keywords that rank. The other thing, we've talked a lot about intent. It's really focused on informational. So some of what we've been doing for YouTube research is a little bit of a reverse. We're actually looking at what YouTube shows up for, and then where could we find opportunity within that? Um, but this is some of that guidance. The biggest thing that helps YouTube videos win inside of AI search is clarity. And that's true for any content, whether you're writing it on the website. Maybe you've heard a lot about, like, FAQ structure, where it's question, answer. What we see with YouTube is really similar. If your prompt is for something like the best carry-on luggage for business trips, the videos that show up are reviews for the best carry-on luggage. So thinking about what that looks like, and then starting to think about your influencer content strategy, too. Those videos that we see aren't millions of subscribers on those channels or millions of views. It's thousands. They're a lot smaller. They're niched into a category. So how do you start to reach out and work with those people where maybe you have a little more flexibility? It's probably a little higher value than if, if the goal is visibility, right? Higher value than maybe getting included inside of, like, a daily vlog because that's not really gonna answer the question. That's maybe more of, like, a brand visibility play. Um, but this is really more about how do you be-- control the narrative ultimately, um, by being able to guide that person's content. Okay, so orchestration, what does it look like when there are all of these opportunities on the table? I also didn't include everyone, right? We're talking to affiliate, we're talking to creative, um, we've been working with the influencer team and tracking some results, collaborating with SEO. Um, but it's a crawl, walk, run. So I have a lot of brands who come to us. I won't say a lot. It's a, a section of brands who are like, "We've never done SEO, and we're worried about AI search," and I'm like, "Oh, no. Ooh." So you're in phase one. You're in phase one. Like, we have to get the foundations in place, indexability, crawlability, content, all still super critical for AI search. Phase two, we're starting to think about how we build brand. How do we start to build off of some of your owned entities? It's a little lighter lift, but maybe it's not on your own website. And then number three is really shaping the narrative, and that's where we get into, like, the Reddits and things like that. So phase one, um, thinking about how do you strengthen, structure what you already have. I think good SEO strategy has always been about how do we add value to what's already built versus constantly focusing on net new. Um, I will say that AI search world has opened up the door to a content strategy that was, like, really popular, I don't know, maybe like, five or 10 years ago of, like, we're gonna post a million blogs. We're gonna post 10 blogs a week, and it's gonna be great. We're gonna post a bunch of listicles. That is not the direction I would go. Um, as a follow-up, if you wanna take a look, there is, uh, Google came out with some documentation about commodity versus non-commodity content. So when we're thinking about brand-building, um, commodity content is something like the seven best carry-ons. Non-commodity content is how my carry-on survived 40,000 miles of road trip, right? It's a much more interesting, unique POV, but you're still expressing the same thing, and then you're starting to get into more of, like, a brand-led content strategy, which can phase us into number two. So, um, in, uh, my past lives, I've always worked with a PR team as part of an SEO campaign. Uh, I think it's really critical to be able to elevate and actually, um, amplify the content that we're creating. It's really easy for SEO content to just die on the website, and you're just hoping that it ranks and hoping someone arrives at it. We should be collaborating more. Um, we should be-- You should be bringing in your comms team to be able to have conversations about, like, okay, what is this larger content strategy where we can actually build authority around a topic? Um, there's a really great MuckRack study, but MuckRack found there's about 20 outlets typically that are polled. They also update that, like, regularly. I would totally check it out. Um, and then visual search, like, what does that look like, and how does that start to become a part of that larger content narrative? And then number three, affiliate. I think Muck Rack will tell you that, "Oh, it's all earned media, earned media. It's an earned media diet." I don't disagree with that, but when you look at what matters in some categories, like electronics, top 10 citations, CNET, Forbes, everybody is pay-to-play. So will that persist? Maybe not eventually. Um, but for now, that's the case. It is like a little bit of a buy-in. So I think you can identify what that looks like, which affiliate partners make sense, um, start to niche down into what matters in your category, what matters maybe for a platform that you're looking at. We see citation rates differ quite a bit from, like, Gemini, ChatGPT, et cetera. Um, but then also starting to, to think about Reddit and social influence. So for right now, we're doing a lot of, like, social listening within Reddit. Like, what are the conversations that are happening there? It's really just three to five subreddits that it pulls from. Um, so how do you take that and turn that into better narrative? Okay, and this is what orchestration looks like for AI SEO. These are the conversations, insight exchanges that should happen cross-team. You may not have all of these teams, but figure out which ones you do, where you can pull resources from, and how you can start to collaborate. Uh, I am an SEO, so I put myself in the middle. Um, but I do think SEO is the best, uh, best group to drive this, right? We have a lot of the history. I think SEO and PR comms teams tied together, um, can really make a really big impact within your org and start to think about how you, uh, create cross-channel collaboration for AI search visibility. And that's my last slide. Thank you, guys.

---

Mat Kennyon (Matt Kenyon / Surfer)

By the end of this video, you'll know how to take any keyword and turn it into a piece of content that actually ranks — in Google and in AI search. This will be an over-the-shoulder, repeatable process you can use every single time you sit down to write. I'm Matt Kenyon, and I've partnered with Surfer to bring you that process, step by step. We're going from keyword to published post. I'll show you every decision along the way, and I'll walk through Surfer's Content Editor as we go — so you can see exactly how each step works in practice. One thing before we start — this whole process assumes you already have a target keyword. One keyword per piece of content. If you're writing about "how to do keyword research," that's your keyword. If you don't have a keyword yet, I'll link a keyword research tutorial in the description. Go watch that first, come back with your keyword, and pick up here. Let's get into it. STEP 0: Check Search Intent Before you open any tool, do a quick gut check. Search your keyword in Google and look at what's ranking. If the first page is all how-to guides, you're writing a how-to guide. If it's all listicles, write a listicle. If it's all product pages, a blog post probably won't rank for this keyword — pick a different one. This is search intent. Google has already decided what type of content searchers want for your keyword. Your job isn't to fight that — it's to match the format and do it better than what's already there. And by the way — if you want to analyze search intent automatically and at scale, Surfer's Topical Map lets you do just that by visualizing all of your topical clusters and their intent from one convenient view. But that's a topic for a separate video — I'll drop a link to learn more about that in the description. Anyway, that gut check takes thirty seconds. If you skip it, everything that follows is wasted — no amount of optimization fixes a content type mismatch. Intent confirmed? Good. Let's get to writing. I'm going to walk you through this using Surfer's Content Editor. The tool matters less than the principles — cover your topic with authority, show first-hand experience where you have it, match search intent. That's true no matter what you use. Alright — enter your target keyword. We're targeting "how to write a case study." Surfer will prompt you to select your content type. If you're not sure, you can select SERP based and it will automatically pull in real-time data from the search results for that keyword. After that, you'll get an opportunity to add special context, instructions, and brand knowledge. If you choose to use Surfer AI to generate the article, it will bake that information into the draft itself. This can be anything from your brand voice guidelines, product or service details, or non-negotiable talking points. If you sold a service that helped people write case studies, for example, this is where you'd drop a short description of that service, who it's for, and the problems it solves. Even better, you can save this as a custom template. So the next time you spin up an article, your brand voice, product positioning, and house style are already loaded. Next, we'll enter writing mode. And here you've got a choice: start with an AI draft, or write it yourself from scratch. For this video, I'm going to walk through the full content writing process so you can see how every piece fits together. But if you need speed — and a lot of people do — Surfer's AI draft is a genuinely strong option. This is where the brand knowledge and context you just added really pay off. Most AI-generated articles read like slop because the model has nothing to work with except the keyword. Surfer's draft is different. It pulls in your brand voice, your product, your positioning — every detail you added in the last step — and writes an article that actually sounds like it came from your company. In my experience, the draft comes back about 90% there — structured, on-topic, and already optimized for both Google and AI search before you've typed a single word. You just review, tighten, and add your personal experience on top. One more thing worth knowing: Surfer doesn't charge extra for AI articles anymore. No separate credit bucket, no premium tier — if you're on a Surfer plan, generate as many drafts as you want. Alright — for this walkthrough, I'm going to write it myself, heading by heading, so you can see the full process. Let's keep going. My favorite part of the Content Editor's interface is this clear step-by-step process on the right-hand sidebar. This is like a balm for my OCD brain. We'll just walk through these one-by-one. STEP 1: Research & Create Outline Starting with Step #1, Research & Create Outline. There are three tabs here: Competitors, Questions, and Notes. The Competitors tab is where you spend most of your time. It shows you the actual outlines from the pages currently ranking for your keyword — the headings they use, how they structure the content, what topics they cover. You can expand each competitor and see exactly how they organized their article. Above that, Surfer generates an AI-powered outline based on what's working across all of these competitors. You can hit "Insert Outline" and it drops a complete structure into your editor as a starting point. Now, you can do this manually — open each of the top ten results, read through them, and take notes on what they cover. That works. It just takes much longer. The Content Editor compresses that into a few seconds. Either way, here's how to use competitor data. Don't just accept any outline as-is. Treat it as your starting point. Look at what all ten competitors cover — that's table stakes, you need it. Then look for gaps — topics only one or two competitors mention, or topics none of them cover that you know are relevant. Your outline should be about 70% proven topics and 30% unique angles. This is where AI earns its keep. If no unique angles are jumping out, I'll copy and paste the outline into Claude and simply ask, "If I want to write an article on 'how to write a case study' what's missing from this outline that could help me more thoroughly satisfy the user's search intent? Do deep research across X, reddit, YouTube, Facebook, LinkedIn and more to get the freshest possible user signals." A lot of times AI will surface things you would've never thought of, like when my Claude Code agent found out that the #1 pain point across community sites is how to actually get client permission and buy-in for case studies, which is completely missing from my current outline. I was also missing things like: How to write questions that draw out great answers from stakeholders The power of video case studies And how to use anonymized data when clients don't want to be named in case studies I added all of these as sub-headings to my existing outline. Another thing that sets you apart from competitors is real, concrete examples of whatever it is you're talking about. In this case, I wanted to find real case study examples worth studying and include those in the article, so I spun up another agent to hunt the web for the best case studies around. My agent surfaced the standouts. The goal was to move the reader from theory to real examples they could learn from. This step used to take hours — sometimes even days — of manual research and massaging the outline. With Surfer and some handy AI tools, it takes a fraction of the time and is more thoroughly researched. Once I'm happy with my outline, it's time to start writing. STEP 2: Write & Optimize Now we're in Write & Optimize. This is where you actually write the content — and Surfer gives you real-time feedback as you go. This is the point in the process where I just go heading by heading and write naturally. I always say that if you spend enough time in the outline process, the writing process should feel like paint-by-numbers. I'll usually have my AI agent in another window helping me surface research, and it's off to the races. Another thing I love about building a strong outline is that telling myself I need to write a 3,500-word blog post is extremely overwhelming. It's much more psychologically manageable to reframe it as, I'm just going to write about Types of Case Studies. Then How to Write a Case Study... one section at a time, chipping away at the piece bit-by-bit. Writing the hook — research showed that nobody actually reads case studies. People just need to know you have them. That's the hook. Something like: "Nobody actually reads case studies — but you need them anyway. Here's how to make one worth skimming." Okay. I've finished my first draft. Let's look at some of the tools we have on the right-hand side of the screen to make this piece as optimized as possible for humans, Google, and AI search. First, your on-page targets. The word count, headings, and paragraphs are all based on the top-ranking posts. Don't think of them as hard and fast rules, but more like a compass pointing you in the direction of the kind of depth Google wants for this keyword. If you're way over, consider trimming. If you're way under, you're likely not covering the topic in as much depth as users expect. Next, you've got the Content Score — the gauge at the top. Before I get into what the numbers mean, it's worth understanding what the score is actually measuring. Here's the reality of SEO: we don't actually know how Google's algorithm works. We write content, it goes into a black box, and a ranked results page comes out the other side. The only thing we can observe is the SERP — which pages Google decided to rank, and which ones it didn't. So the best any of us can do is reverse-engineer. And that's exactly what Content Score is — Surfer analyzes the pages currently ranking for your keyword, finds the patterns they share, and measures your content against those patterns. Entities, facts, word count, structure — all pulled directly from what Google is already rewarding. It's not an arbitrary number. It's a measurement of how closely your content matches what's already winning. Surfer recently rebuilt the Content Score in a way that makes it a lot more powerful. You'll see three numbers now. The big one in the middle is your overall Content Score out of 100. On the left, your SEO score — how ready your content is to rank in Google. On the right, your AI Search score — how ready your content is to get cited by LLMs. That AI Search score is the one I'd pay the most attention to. When someone asks ChatGPT, Perplexity, or Google's AI Overviews a question about your topic, those models pull their answer from somewhere. Your AI Search score is a direct measure of how likely "somewhere" is you. Every point you push that score up is a better shot at your content being the one that feeds the AI's answer — with your brand named inside it. Push both scores into the green and you've covered the whole board: organic traffic from Google today, and citations in AI answers tomorrow. So how do you actually push those scores up? Two optimization tracks sitting side-by-side in the sidebar: Optimize for SEO, and Optimize for AI Search. Let's walk through each. Optimize for SEO: Entities Under Optimize for SEO, you'll see entities. An entity is a specific concept or term that the top-ranking pages consistently mention. Think of them as the vocabulary of your topic. If the top ten results for "how to write a case study" all mention "customer testimonials," "ROI," and "pain points," and your content doesn't, Google notices that gap. You'll see a count — something like 38 out of 81. That means you've covered 38 of the 81 entities Surfer identified. You don't need to hit all 81. But the more relevant ones you cover naturally, the stronger your topical coverage. You don't want to force them in — if a term doesn't fit your content, skip it. But if you're missing a core concept, that's a signal your content has a hole. Optimize for AI Search: Facts This is the part that didn't exist a year ago. Under Optimize for AI Search, you'll see Facts. These are ideas that LLMs have a history of citing when users query terms around your topic. So if you want to be a source for AI assistants, you increase your odds by including these facts. Here's what's happening behind the scenes. Surfer pulls information from two types of sources — you can see them labeled right here. "AI Models" and "Web pages." It's scanning what ChatGPT, Google AI Overviews, and Perplexity are saying about your topic, and it's also scanning the top-ranking web pages. Then it identifies the specific facts that these sources consistently include. Facts are grouped by topic. So for "how to write a case study," we have a group called "writing tips" with three facts underneath it — things like "identifying your goal, including specific data, and making the customer the protagonist." Each one is a concrete, verifiable piece of information that AI systems look for when deciding whether to cite your content. The logic is simple. When someone asks ChatGPT "how do I write a case study," it pulls its answer from pages that contain real, specific, factual information — not pages full of vague advice. The Facts panel tells you exactly what to include so your content becomes the kind of source AI wants to cite. And if you don't want to add entities and facts one at a time, hit Auto Optimize. It handles both in one click — adds missing entities naturally and inserts relevant facts, all while preserving your voice and writing style. In my case, running Auto Optimize took my Content Score from a 68 to an 89 in about ten seconds. One thing worth calling out: if your score is stuck even after Auto Optimize, the gap usually isn't surface-level entities or facts — it's coverage. You're missing a subtopic the ranking pages all cover. Open the Competitors tab again, look for a heading two or three of them share that your outline skipped, and write that section. Eight times out of ten, that fills the gap. A few writing fundamentals while we're here: First, lead with the answer. If someone searches "how long does it take to rank on Google," your first paragraph should give them the answer — "typically 3 to 6 months" — and then explain the nuance. Don't bury it. The searcher came for an answer. Give it to them, then earn their time with depth. Second, use short paragraphs. I'm talking two to three sentences max. Walls of text kill mobile readability — and most of your traffic is mobile. Third, use subheadings every 200-300 words. They help readers scan and give Google and LLMs explicit signals about what each section covers. A good tip that SEOs have used for decades is to phrase your headings as the questions users are actually asking. Lots of brands still do this and it works like a charm for both traditional and AI SEO. Fourth, prioritize clarity over cleverness. Aim to write at a sixth-grade reading level, definitely no more than an 8th grade level. Write so nobody has to re-read a sentence to understand it. Okay. I've added in the remaining facts, naturally inserted a good amount of SEO entities, and gotten myself a respectable score. But we're not done yet. STEP 3: Internal Links Internal linking is one of the highest-leverage things you can do for a new post — and it takes five minutes. When we say internal links, we're specifically referring to contextual links from your existing content (usually the body copy) to your new post, and from your new post back to related existing content. You know, the things all over the average Wikipedia page leading to every other Wikipedia page. These help Google discover your page faster and build topical context. When you link from your "keyword research guide" to this new "case study" post, Google understands these topics are related and that your site comprehensively covers content marketing. Connect your Google Search Console, and Surfer scans your existing content to find relevant internal linking opportunities. It uses your actual site data combined with semantic analysis to suggest links that make sense — not just keyword matches. Thanks to Surfer, you can insert all your relevant contextual links without even leaving the content editor. This used to be a manual process of searching site:yourdomain.com and finding relevant pages one at a time. Now, it's done in a single click. I'll usually aim to add about 3-5 internal links within this new post, pointing to my existing related content. Then go back to 3-5 existing posts and add a link from each of them to this new page. That second part is easy to overlook — your new page needs incoming links from your own site, not just outgoing ones. Those incoming links tell Google this page matters and where it fits in your content ecosystem. With our internal links dialed in, we're ready to move into Step 4: pre-publish review. STEP 4: Pre-Publish Review This is your quality gate — the final polish before publishing. At this point, I'll re-read the piece (usually out loud) to catch any awkward phrasing, throat-clearing, or unnecessary hedging. I'll also ask myself: how can this piece be even better? For me, this means including real screenshots of case studies, potentially sourcing some expert quotes from brands who are doing case studies well, and, if I have access to design resources, building custom visual assets for the piece. Think infographics, diagrams, stuff like that. I'll also usually do a quick scan on YouTube to see if there are any relevant videos I can embed into the piece. And no, it doesn't have to be videos from me. Any videos help break up the copy and increase engagement with the page. Once I'm done here, I'll use Surfer's three quality control tools for pre-publishing. First, the readability Score. This tells you what education level a reader needs to understand your content. You'll see a number and a plain-English description — something like "Your text can be read by people with at least a college level education." For most content, you want this accessible to a broad audience. If the score is low, simplify your sentence structure and cut the jargon. Next, a plagiarism Check. Hit "Run Plagiarism Checker" and it compares your content against what's already indexed. Original content ranks. Duplicate content doesn't. If you used AI to help draft, this is especially important — AI tools sometimes produce passages that closely mirror existing published content. Finally, AI Readability. Hit "Analyze Content" and Surfer scans your article against the formatting that AI systems prefer when deciding what to cite. Clear structure, defined terms, factual claims with context. Think of it as: would an AI model be able to pull a clean, accurate answer from your page? Think of Pre-Publish Review as your pre-flight checklist: readable for humans and AI, no plagiarism issues, every section delivers on its heading. STEP 5: Publish or Export Congrats! You've made it. Once everything checks out, it's time to ship it. First — meta tags. Surfer generates a title and meta description for you, with character counts right there. You'll see something like 68 out of 70 characters for the title, 155 out of 156 for the description. Your target keyword should be near the front of the title, and the description should tell the searcher exactly what they'll get. For export, you have options. If your WordPress site is connected, you can publish directly. Otherwise, copy your content as formatted text or Markdown, or download it as HTML or Markdown for whatever CMS you're using. One important thing after you publish: don't expect results in week one. Google needs to crawl, index, and evaluate your content. Most pages reach their ranking potential in 3 to 6 months. If you're in a low-competition niche, it can be faster. In a competitive one — legal, finance, health — plan on the longer end, or longer. So set a reminder to check back at 30, 60, and 90 days. If it's climbing, your process worked. If it's stuck, come back into the Content Editor, check what's now ranking above you, and fill the gaps. Surfer's content score will update with fresh SERP data, so you can see exactly where your content has fallen behind. So that's the whole process. Pick a keyword, run it through these five steps, and ship something this week. Nothing makes this real like doing it once. Yes, AI tools allow anybody to create content, but creating excellent content that's useful, unique, informative, and optimized for search? That's still a coveted skillset — and Surfer can help you get there. I'll drop a link to Surfer's Content Editor in the description. Subscribe for more SEO tutorials, and if you want to keep learning, be sure to watch this video next. Thanks for watching, and happy ranking.
